If they censor buzzfeed and clickbait huffington post, I'll be okay with that. 
Nice. Only censor things you disagree with.
Nah just things that are dumb
Just a quick grammar tip: “Regarding to Cispa” doesn’t work. Use “Regarding Cispa” or “In regard to Cispa”.
I feel like the scumbag had should be on the building in the pic.
Out of the loop here 
Much ado about nothing. Again. 
I understand being out of the loop, but this text explains enough before google
Vpns and Proxy's FTW
I bought a VPN a long time ago. No regrets.
The fact that people actually believe this is astonishing.
Is this a thing again? Or.....?
You are so edgy my fingers are being cut as I type this.
Slightly used dining room table, bought 15 years ago for 500$, looking for 499$, non negotiable!
This is painfully true. I was looking for a mountain bike last summer, I didn't want a $100 one from walmart, but didn't want to invest $700 on something "real" yet either so I thought craigslist would be a great idea.
I messaged so many people, selling 10+ year old bikes and all of them were firm on their sky high prices. I did quite a bit of research and knew those bikes were not worth the asking price.
It's like look, I don't care the condition it's in and that's it's been kept in your garage, you do not get to nearly make your money back on a decade old buyer's remorse.
I even found one guy very close to me selling his wife's bike for $350. I found the same exact bike model, online at Dick's for under $200 on special clearance just for the weekend. So I message him the link saying look dude, I don't want to wait for shipping or assembly I'll give you $200 cash right now for this bike. He replies back "my wife wants at least $300" 
Ooookay dude, whatever you say. I bet that shitty listing is still up. Ended up getting the bike a Dick's and it's really awesome. 
My dad on his computer: "be careful with it I spent $1000 on it" (he did, 10 years ago.. it's worth $50 on ebay atm) Some people just can't get it through their head that values change over time 
I'm impressed a $1000 computer from 2005 is still kicking! Haha
I was using my old laptop today (it was $1200 in 2007), we have it hooked up to the tv as a secondary streaming device. It's usual cooling pad had been taken away and it actually started freezing from overheating, the sound just stopped working, it was bizarre. I had to literally put an ice pack on it to get it working again so I could watch a twitch stream. Hahaha
HP dv6000?
Holy shit, hat was my first laptop! I don't think it was worth that much. 
Just looked on Cnet's old reviews, they were over $1000! Then most of the motherboards cooked themselves to death :(
Yep, my $1000 laptop from like 2008 is starting to give me a lot of problems, overheating/shutting down/really slow etc..
Modified cars, guns, bikes, etc... They always think they're worth their weight in gold. They have a really bad habit of tacking on everything they ever spent on it straight onto the price as well as pricing the damned thing like it was new.
/r/delusionalcraigslist 
I hate those people. 
Can I trade you that for Mortal Kombat?
Sounds like the computer ads I've seen on there.
This was my Grandmother about everything.  25 year old wet/dry vac?  She wanted what could buy a new one at the time for.  I was like Holy, s$%t I think you got your money's worth out of it already.
Then she would stupidly throw away things that were worth a lot of money.  
I ignore ads without pictures. Don't want to waste my time.
another useful tip, avoid ads that include a lot of grammatical errors.
Spelling errors in tiltes however, have gotten me some good deals.
This has saved me a lot of braincells and time.
And you probably still have both of your kidneys!
I, as a rule of thumb, immediately close any ad that uses the word "mint". 
You can even check the box to hide them for you. 
Imagine how wonderful it would be if you could trust the posts without pictures!
Im trying to sell some custom shelving units and in lieu of putting it together (too much screws!) i made a detailed diagram and posted a picture of a single board for colour reference. NOT A SINGLE FRICKEN CLICK. 
I also thought it would be a good idea to include a really decent write-up in the description. But i think i have to limit it to smaller words... like 6 characters max.
tl/dr Successful ad is like a childrens book; pretty pictures and small words.
The great part is the original line would be a good comeback to this. 
Which is?
If the seller said, "I find your lack of faith disturbing"
Not sure why people downvote this. It's been years since I last saw the movie and I'm sure we're not the only ones who don't remember the line. 
What do you mean by years!?  Don't you rewatch it every time it gets remastered and re-released with those can't miss extras?  Once they add in JarJar it will be perfect...
As Lucas originally intended.
I buy and sell on craigslist a lot and the most frustrating thing is buying laptops.  Trying to get information about the notebooks they're trying to sell is worst than pulling teeth.   
"It has a quad core processor and a webcam"
"Is the processor intel or amd?  what generation is it?"
"It's windows"
FACEPALM
Hell at least they knew what the processor was!
A guy that my mom works with was trying to sell a laptop recently. She insisted she bring it home to me first so I could verify its worth.
13" screen, 2gigs of RAM, Win8 (Not what was originally on it, no key included) and a dual-core processor. I'm like "$50." She takes it back to him and he's like "It's worth at least $250! I can play lots of games on it!" 1) Wal-Mart will get you that same deal and the thing will be new. 2) You aren't playing shit on this thing besides FB games. It loads up and runs the internet. It's worth $50.
Oh come on you can't buy a new laptop for $50
Think he was referring to the 250 price
Maybe for 250 but that is an amazingly cheap new laptop.
250 numbnuts
That made me want cry.
This can work in your favor. If the seller knows very little about computers, they are also less able to assess its true value and willing to accept a very low offer, especially if it doesn't work because of some easy-to-fix problem like reinstalling the OS or replacing the HD.
"Selling Camera" 
Or when they typed, '4 sell' 
$1 in the price section. Body of the posting says $4,000, price is firm.
Which is why I set the minimum price to $50 (when looking at cars).
I know these dipshits aren't selling their 1970 Hemi Cuda for $1...
Where my parents live there is no difference in pronunciation between sell and sale. 
Just so long as they don't alter the deal. Then you would have to pray they don't alter it further.
i honestly opened the link expecting that line 
--((THIS IS A LEGIT POST!))-- $1
When I was looking for apartments I made a point to go to the places without pictures. Often old landlords wouldn't know how to put a picture on the Internet and I's be able to find places most people would have ignored.
Also ran into some places that looked like crack houses. 
I hate taking a wrong turn and finding a meth house. Gets me every time
The worst is when they do this with apartments, i mean what the fuck?
Especially when you're hunting for a trans girl to bang and there aren't pictures of them. I don't want some 50 year old bearded dude in a wig ffs. 
...or so I have to assume 
If the posting does not have pictures, look into it further I won't.
Thats because they are just seeing if it's worth anything before stealing it. 
I hate people on Craigslist. To be blunt, they're fucking morons. As a seller, I provide what I would want as a buyer, information. I'll find the product being sold online and copy pasta that into my description. If no description can be copied, I do my best to make my own. Size, dimensions, functions etc... I'll also give details why I'm selling, how much I want, where I'm located etc... Then I'll add a fuck ton of pictures from every angle. When craigslist allows 26 photos, you're an idiot not to take advantage of that. More information means no surprises and better likelihood of a sale going through. Fuck waiting around all day just for someone to take one glance and say no. 
All that clear and concise information and I still get contacted by people who email first, read later. Furniture is the biggist hassle, even when I'm listing it on free. I say bring moving equipment and at least two strong people since sice I don't want broken glass everywhere. I get the 4'11" Hispanic woman who tries to convince me that she and her cousin of similar stature can safely load a 6x3 foot glass table into the cousion's Prius.
It's so hard to read people from their emails. Most e-mails range from asking me what my price is when it's already listed to asking if it's still "avaleble." The best buyer is the one that writes a legible e-mail, makes an initial offer, and says when they would be avaliable to meet. They then sign it with their first name. Don't ask if it's avaliable, the seller will tell you if it isn't. The more you write, the more that seperates you and the spammers. Then stay by your email and fucking respond promptly. 
Then there are just the assholes who try and knock you down when you're already giving it away. The worst though are the people who negotiate after you've already made a deal. I'll wait around all day for this guy to show up only for him to come 2 hours late and only carrying half the money he promised. Fuck those people. 
As a buyer, well, most sellers suck. They list things in the wrong category, they don't provide pictures, they give vague to no details and then don't respond to emails. Or they're the idiot who thinks they understand marketing. Your moldy basement that is not up to code is not a "luxury 1 bedroom apartment."
Maybe I've just been smart with who I make deals with, but I haven't run into any scammers. Some people are "accidentally" short $5 when it comes time to pay (fuck you if you do that), but no money orders or people jumping me. Maybe I'm just selling/buying nicer shit that attracts a better quality demographic. 
Thing is, Craigslist is full of posts by thieves. They don't post the image of the thing because they don't want someone to recognize it.
I've gotten offers for $150 speakers for $20, and $200 headsets for $40. You get the picture.
NYC is relatively safe so back when I was a greedy little shit I'd show up and often times the thing would have obviously been dropped, without a charger, or something else which would make you think that there's a strong possibility that the thing was stolen. Even now you can see plenty of posts about ID-locked iPhones on sale.
This is one of the best ways to get things really cheep some times. A lot of the time everyone ignores them and those people tend to not estimate the items worth very well. I got a barely used current generation iPad for half price like that. 
I hated looking for local jobs on Craigslist. They'd often be put there before Indeed, so it was worth looking. Except the first three pages were filled with Uber ads.
Especially if they're trying to sell something like a car for thousands of dollars and won't even take the effort to post a single picture.
This is a new thing now. 1 shit picture of a car and they want you to call for more pics. So these morons can "sell you" on their piece  of shit rust bucket w a salvaged title. 
 If I see one pic I move on. Why waste your time and somebody else's with one picture? 
The entire layout and UI of Craigslist is just awful.  Like a website from the mid-90's.
Wait. it's the 2000s already?
I personally kind of like the charm. Makes it stand out from other marketplaces like Ebay or Amazon as simple, easy classifieds.
Check has picture, owner only, and view gallery.  
Fucking right !! 
What's with the gif of those 24 women? I don't get it. 
Um, hello? This ain't Narnia, it's Craigslist. I can't post any pictures of you in a gimp suit locked in dog suit until you submit.
Better yet, why are there so many ads were there's Vaseline on the camera lens?  
Depending where you are on the site, you might find the pictures that way as well...
"Im altering the deal, pray I don't alter the deal any further". 
I like how you shopped the scumbag driver in there. Lol
Thanks! I'm glad you saw it! 
I couldn't see him because his highbeams are on.
That kind of the point.
What a dick 
Good eye
I like how you pointed it out
I've got to say, I appreciate the effort.  Well done, OP!
When people drive behind me with high beams on, I stick my fog light on. Usually does the trick. 
I'm confused. Aren't fog lights the little ones under the main headlights on the front? Do you have one that points backwards
Volvo and probably a few others have a fog light out back that's a single light that looks different than brake lights. 
The Volvo I know this from also had regular driving lights (fog lights, the ones down low) out front. Plus normal lights and high beams. 
That's why they have that one absurdly bright brake light on the left inside? Never realized it was a fog light. Figured it was a weird Volvo manufacturing defect thing. 
Audi has rear fogs too
An audi salesman explained to my friend that this is exactly what the rear food are best at- no-speed-change brake checks 
Oh my Audi has these. I only actually use them in dire situations because I don't want to cause an accident. But sometimes you gotta hit him with the super bright rear fogs and let them know what the fuck is up. Several times.
Here in the UK, all cars have to have a rear fog light, which is as others have said, a really bright red light. 
It's pretty much a red highbeams. 
All cars in Europe must have a rear fog light. They are red and as bright as a break light. 
They must be to the left of the center of the car. Some are all the way to the left and some are almost in the middle. 
Some manufacturers leave the fog light in the car when selling in the US. 
A lot of cars that have them run 2, one on each side.  
[deleted]
Rear middle light is obligatory in Europe not illegal. 
I think the rear fog thing varies by country.  IIRC, most require one, but the majority also allow 2.  
Most European cars have front fog lights and red rear fog lights 
I had two in the back on my Volvo 850, under the reverse light.
Yeah, I don't screw with that anymore. The local police here in Michigan have been leaving their brights on, and then pulling people over when they flash their lights back. 
A (white) kid was high and didn't want to give the officer his license, and the officer pulled him out of the car, got really violent with him, and then shot him like 5-7 times, claiming the kid attacked him after he tazed the kid. 
I just look to the right until the car passes.
I'd gladly let them pull me over so I can fight that in traffic court.  I'm pretty damn sure that telling someone else they're blinding you doesn't count as inappropriate use of high beams.  
It sounds like that cop just wanted some extra paid time off
There's only a few cars here in north america with rear fog ligths, and in general the moron driver use them all the time! Following a Volvo or a Mini with his rear fog ligths is as blindly as the moron using the front high beam.
In a way, I'm glad there is no rear fog ligths in the US !!
In Europe it's illegal to have your fog lights on if there is no fog or heavy rain or something.
But some people still do it of course.  
I also hate trucks that have HID lights. Cars are okay when they're behind me, but a trucks, lifted or not, the lights shine right in my fucking rear view and annoy the piss out of me.
Proper HID's are fine. They're in a projector housing and adjusted correctly. It is the assholes that put HID's in a reflector housing that piss me off regardless of what you drive. There is a reason that's not legal in most places.
I once got caught behind stuck with one of these assholes at 3AM and for some reason they felt like following me for 10 miles so I could appreciate the grandeur of their hi-beams. This is the kind of shit that makes me want to buy a flood lamp for my rear lights and reciprocate the joy.
Edit: words
I once got caught behind one of these assholes at 3AM and for some reason they felt like following me
You got caught behind the guy that was following you? That's some trippy stuff, man. 
This is when you just slow way down to force him to pass, and then you lay your high beams on him.
Nope, you just go 20% below the limit. See if they like 10 miles of that.
Also, turn on your fog light.
/never suffer alone
Thats actually illegal in Australia. 10% under the speed limit is the threshold I think.
Makes sense though, if everyone is going at the same speed, there's less risk of an accident.
if everyone is going at the same speed, there's less risk of an accident.
Not actually true. 
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Solomon_curve
You are less likely to be involved in an accident if you are going about 5 mph faster than the flow of traffic. If everyone is going the same speed they all stay bunched together and the likelyhood of a collision increases.
I like to adjust my rear view mirror so that it shines right back in their face. I can't see them anyway...
I simply pull over and let them go by.
That works only on roads with a shoulder, or a convenient driveway.
In some rural areas you can go for miles at a time without either option. 
Really? I've driven plenty of rural roads. Rarely are they so narrow that you can't move over and give someone room to go by. 
On the east coast especially, most rural roads are relatively narrow and almost have lots of hills and are very curvy. 
I live in MA. Seriously, it's not that hard to move over.
Sunroof + pennies = no more tailgaters 
You should just keep a small bag of gravel in your glove box.
Oh okay. Well TIL. so i have a better reason to hate those guys then who fuck my vision up.
So nice to have a car with auto dimming rear and side view mirrors. Doesn't completely eliminate the problem but helps quite a bit - doesn't blind me and I can still see behind me well enough if I need to. 
Ive got a rear window shade.  Push of a button and it goes up.  Almost tempted to write something on it as a message to the asshole tailgating me since thats the only time i use it.
Well look at Mr. 1% here with his fancy car buttons to push 
My raptor had hids and didn't blind people. Auto levelers are there for a reason. 
Most trucks don't have hids from factory though. So you're probably thinking of trucks that have aftermarket hids. Those never have auto levelers and tend to blind people (they do the same in cars with shit mods as well). 
Yeah dinosaurs don't usually blind people.
I wouldn't be so sure about that. 
https://youtu.be/M9q8XCW_Fsk?t=2m43s
What's the legal requirements for auto-levelers on HIDs in the USA? Not sure about Europe, but in the UK you must have levelling and a cleaning mechanism if you have HIDs. 
I had a BMW X5 with HIDs but sans headlamp washers, so it's not mandatory at least not in Canada.
Many cars (if not all) have auto levelling HIDs. We don't have a requirement for manually levelling halogens like you do in Europe. 
My raptor had hids and didn't blind people. Auto levelers are there for a reason.
Clever girl....
Most suv's do have HID's though. 
But not a lot of pickups oddly. 
Most suvs don't have HIDs.
Don't all vehicles with HID lights have to have them pointed to the road?
This a million times!! My fiance has a lifted truck with HID lights that he loves to use. What he doesn't realize is that he is putting everyone on the road at risk for the sake of looking "cool." Except only he thinks he looks cool, everyone else thinks he's a jackass. 
There should be a little ledge under your rear view mirror flip it and the high beams should not be a problem anymore.
When I'm sitting at a red and the truck behind me is blinding me in my mirrors I'll try to angle them back into the truck.
I guess it's a good thing that most rear view mirrors have that little toggle on the bottle. Right?
The stupid thing about it is that in some situations it is more dangerous, increasing the chance of a head-on collision. First, oncoming drivers can't see the paint marking their lane when they're blinded by your high beams, and if the road happens to curve a bit at that point not every driver will instinctively find the curve. Second, there is a phenomenon in which drivers trying desperately to avoid a very obvious obstacle lock on to the target and collide with it instead. Blinding drivers to anything but your headlights could cause them to accidentally target you and drive straight into your vehicle.
lock on to the target and collide with it instead
This is an observed psychological phenomenon [name of it eludes me right now] in humans, where you steer towards the thing you're supposed to try and avoid.
Target fixation
Target fixation. Usually something they teach you about in driving ed, especially for the MC license because it's your whole body actually doing the steering. Aim for the gap, not for the obstacle! 
Some people really just need to align their headlights properly. 
Had this issue with a work truck. Company had a bed cap installed on an f150 for stock/tool storage, which changed the stance, but didn't compensate the headlights. Frequently my drive would be before dawn or after dusk, and hauling rigs seemed to be most affected- they were the only ones who flashed me, regularly too, with my regular headlights on. They seemed unphased by my brights and drl's. Once I figured that out, I asked my trusty service shop to adjust them at my next oil change.....They just told me to find the screws and turn them down. I never did it myself, because I couldn't be bothered to look up the specs, and they became my ex-service provider.
You switched mechanics because they didn't charge you 85 dollars an hour to turn a fucking screwdriver?
You're a fucking moron.
Yeah, because they wouldn't, or couldn't, or for whatever reason refused to perform, a simple task on the machine they were supposed to be able to work on. And I wanted it done right, so I wasn't going to eyeball it in my driveway.
That may or may not have been my only issue with them. Doesn't matter. So you can fuck right off with bitch-ass better-than-you tough guy on the internet shit.
I was grabbing a burger in the drive thru last night and someone had their high beams on behind me. I was tempted to get out and tell them to turn them off but didn't want to be confrontational at a drive thru. So I just held my anger inside and cried myself to sleep when I got home. However it was worth it. In-N-Out. 
The perks of having off-roading lights on your truck. If someone doesn't turn off their high beams after I flash them with my highs, I blind that motherfucker with 1000+ lumens
checkmate, motherfucker
ha ive had someone pull over after getting a taste of 300 watts of LED lightbar.  or as my friends call it, "daybreaker"
What light bar do you have. I've been looking for one that doesn't break the bank. 
cuntmate, motherfucker
Ftfy
2 wrongs make a right!
2 blind drivers make a sight!... to be seen on /r/carcrash
Brights. Brights. BRIGHTS!! BRIGHTS!! fine. WAM! Eat lumens bitch! 
Hey look, this guy out-douches douche bags, yay!
Cant tell if sarcasm... Fuck it
I get the desire to retaliate, but the buzz killington in me has to say that sometimes people do it accidentally. It might be some asshole frat bro, but it also might be a family or grandma or something who just didn't realize they had their high beams on. Either way it doesn't really matter. You're completing blinding someone driving a 5000 lb machine 65 mph. Putting lives at risk because you're irritated is remarkably irresponsible. 
Not to mention, you're blinding the driver that is headed towards you. Not smart.
They did it first, and unknowingly is worse! 
No, unknowingly isn't worse at all, it's called a mistake.  Everyone does it.  Turning on an LED light rack deliberately to blind someone and possibly have them run off the road or into oncoming traffic is thousands of times worse.
Fuck why have i never thought of that.... I need to go for a drive now 
As fun or satisfying  as that can be, it can cost you a hefty fine if a cop.sees you doing it. Fyi
That just makes you an asshole. Now you've got two drivers that can't see heading towards each other.  
It amazes me how many people still don't turn their high beams off when I give them a flash or 2.  The driving lights on the front of my Jeep are tied into the high beams, so a high-beam flash gives them a nice 660 watts of halogen to the face.  
I'm usually nice and make the flash quick enough that the bulbs never get to full brightness, but if they still don't turn their high beams off, they get the slightly longer (1/2 second) flash that ends up being much, much brighter.  
http://img163.imageshack.us/img163/1196/animation9sb.gif
Yep!
The Rigid Dually 2s I have mounted in my rear bumper are also great for tailgaters. 
So you deliberately try to blind a person off the road at night because you're annoyed.  Nice subtle touch.  You fit the lifted truck douchebag stereotype.
This is why I carry assault rifles in my up armored red lifted pickup. Going to threaten my life by honking at me? I'm going to threaten yours by shooting your shit clunker minivan until your engine doesn't work and pull everybody out of the car and fuck you one by one.
Going to risk my life mother fucker no Imma risk yours. That'll teach them. 
Justice. Boner. Achieved. Can't wait to see how many upyokes I get on redgag for my vigilantegasm. 
great meme!
I'm not even sure it helps his safety, since if he causes an oncoming car to have an accident, that accident will likely be with him. 
Some people don't understand that concept until it happens to them.
Then it's not their fault, obviously, they were using their high beams to be safe!
I'd love for them to tell the attending officer that "I was driving with my high beams on because it's safer."
"Here's your $200 ticket for illegal use of high beams."
I lived rural when I was a teenager and got really tired of getting high beamed at night on narrow range-roads so I just started bringing my dad's 1,000,000 candlelight power spotlight in my small car. Blinded me pretty good too and was stupid in retrospect but overall I think it cut down on dickheads.
I bought one of those when I was younger. I brought it with me when  I and a couple friends were headed out on long drive because one of them was thinking about buying one and wanted to see how mine worked.
Part way into the trip some guy with the brightest headlights in the world started tailgating us.  After a bit my friend that was sleeping in the back seat, woke up, and took it upon himself to try out my spotlight.  
The tailgater backed off.  
Before the reddit lynch mob forms, just let me say we didn't put him up to it, and I took it away from him immediately after it happened.  
I'll bet the tailgater probably hesitated a bit the next time though. 
North Dakota?
I hope you at least gave warning flashes before doing something that stupid. 
When I was a teenager
And? I was a teenager at one point too and I never did anything as careless as that. 
Nerd alert.
Thanks. 
Poorly aimed headlights be like, https://uproxx.files.wordpress.com/2014/09/crazy-eyes-buscemi.jpg?w=650&h=360
Lmao at the little scumbag steve
Here's a thing that happens: Joe Driver buys a new car. Way nicer than his old car, all sorts of bells and whistles, including auto headlights. Joe doesn't even need to turn his headlights on, just leave the switch on auto and the car will do it for him! There's all sorts of other doo-dads too, bluetooths and auto climate and navigation. This means there's all sorts of lights on the dash, and the sales guy rushed through the delivery and the owners manual is either 500 pages or an app Joe doesn't want to download.
So Joe is driving along and it gets dark and his headlights come on, cool! And wow, they are super bright! They're way better than the ones on the thirty year old shitbox he traded in. Even better, the car has a dash light that comes on when the lights come on. It's blue, just like the high beam on his old car. But there's no way the high beams are on, right? I mean, maybe Joe pushed the light stalk out trying to cancel the annoying fucking turn signal because the passing function was turned on at the factory... but that's not likely, is it?
I used to work at a new car dealer and saw this shit all the time. People driving around with no idea their high beams are on. That's why you see so many newer models doing this.
Incidentally, the flipside of this is that there are a lot of people these days who completely forget to put their headlights on because they're so used to their car's auto-headlights that they forget when they actually turn them off.
My mechanic turns my lights off every time they work on my car (presumably because when it's inside it'll turn on annoying HID lights), and doesn't turn them back to "auto" when they're done.  It usually takes me until after sunset to notice.
Small note to all the haters: You don't necessarily CHOOSE these lights anymore.  For my car, if you wanted navigation and pandora, you had to get HID lights.  It's a "package" for no reason other than nobody wants to buy those annoying lights.
This is why if my next car has automatic lights, I'm still always going to use them manually. Automating everything just leads to carelessness.
OEM HIDs aren't bad because they are properly aimed and installed in a projector housing. Pretty sure that most people who complain about HIDs wouldn't be able to identify OEM installed ones. 
There is no car I've ever seen without a notification of some kind on the dash that says your high beams are on. If you don't know what this is and haven't investigated it you shouldn't be driving. 
I'm pretty sure a blue light turns on a few inches away from the odometer right in front of the driver.  That's kind of hard to miss and cars have been like that since at least the 90s.
How are  they suppose see that blue light on their dash when they are texting?
I always drive with my low beams on day or night. Just a habit my dad told me to do when I was learning to drive. Sometimes though, my high beams are on from the night before and I drive for miles until I realize... So  sometimes I am accidentally a scumbag Steve.
That's what the blue indicator light on your dashboard is for!
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:
Post Title: fuck you if you do this, especially on residential streets 
Top: HIGHBEAMS ALWAYS ON DAY OR NIGHT 
Bottom: FOR HIS OWN SAFETY AT THE EXPENSE OF EVERYONE ELSE 
Original Link1 | Meme Template2
I drove a friend's car while she was a passenger once, and noticed her brights were on. When I pointed out the lit dash indicator she said "I thought that just meant my lights were on". I said no, that means your brights are on. 
"What are brights?" she asks. "I just leave it that way all the time." 
And then you smacked the stupid out of her, right?
This is why half my kc lights face backwards.
KC lights. Lol. Is it 1987? Are they mounted to a sweet chrome roll bar?
You be quiet. The coolest car in Back to the Future was the truck.
Exactly.  
I wouldn't fault motorcyclists who run both high and low beam. 
oncoming left hand turn is the #1 multi-vehicle accident because the car "didn't see" the bike. I much more support excess lighting over excess noise for "saving lives".
Interesting, having your highbeams on for no reason is punishable in Germany. I.e. you're not allowed to use them in residential areas at all. There might be a lot of unneccessary rules here, but this and regular obligatory safety inspections of all cars are not among them
AFAIK it's the law in most places. It's definitely the law here:
§425: Le conducteur d'un véhicule routier doit diminuer l'intensité de l'éclairage avant de son véhicule s'il parvient à moins de 150 mètres d'un véhicule qu'il va croiser, s'il suit un autre véhicule à moins de 150 mètres ou s'il circule sur un chemin où l'éclairage est suffisant.
§425: The driver of a road vehicle must dim the lights on the front of his vehicle when he is less than 150 metres from a vehicle approaching in the opposite direction, when he is less than 150 metres behind another vehicle that he is following or when he is moving on a highway that is sufficiently lighted.
Does anyone else remember that commercial with the car with the headlights so bright that it killed all of the vampires? I always thought that was such shitty advertising. Like "our lights are the most obnoxiously bright"
Unless you're alone on a dark country road, there is no reason that you should have your highbeams on.
I agree, so long as they are turned off for coming traffic. Most do but I have seen some forget
But I am driving tipsy and one of my headlights is out and I don't want to get pulled over so I keep my high beams on and it helps me see better and they wouldn't have it on the car if I wasn't supposed to use it. 
-Half the idiots by me. 
Or any unlit highway at night...
Have you ever lived in the midwest? Good luck avoiding deer withouts brights 
Unless you're alone on a dark country road,
In Wisconsin and Minnesota it's pretty common to see deer carcasses every few miles on the interstates and those are the ones that didn't make it.  I always turn off my brights when there is oncoming traffic at night but if not they're on.
Low beams day or night is cool though.  I'll never understand people driving around at dusk while totally invisible until right on top of someone.
In the rain too.
A good rule of thumb is, "if your wipers are on, your headlights should be too."
I believe that's actually the law where I live in Virginia.
And lights at dawn and dusk are a must. My grandfather was an ambulance driver for many years - I've grown up hearing dawn and dusk are the most dangerous times to drive, because people think they can see, but very often can't (blinded by sunrise/sunset, enough light to see the road but not really other unlighted cars, etc.)
I always turn on my low beams in any sort of rain or reduced visibility at all. No real reason not to.
It's astounding how many people drive in a downpour without their headlights on... in their gray cars.
it's not so safe when the car in the other lane runs into yours because they can't see shit.
every single gawd damn morning the same person in the same car passes the opposite way of me and they always have their brights on. I have flashed mine at them and they refuse to turn theirs down. I wish so badly I had an RPG so I could blow that son of a bitch to hell. Seriously, I would take this assholes life if I could legally do so. So if you do this, fuck you in the ass with a fire poker 
I have an old patrol ute that has really bright low beams. Once I was driving home after dark and this car in front of me kept going slower and slower. Went from 70 to 30 over a couple hundred meters kept this crawl up till we hit a red light and stopped. This old lady stuck her head out the window and yelled at me to turn off my high beams. I yelled back that they weren't the high beams and that this was the high beams and turned on both my high beams and spotties. Funny as. I guess I must have scared her or something as she quickly sped off threw the red light. The thing is though the lights were all standard lights that came on the car when it was new n 97. I had never even had to change any of the bulbs. hehehehe
I've noticed that when you try to reason with some people, they think that you're attacking them. People are dumb.
OR playing loud music in residential areas especially with windows down.
Those lenser led torches are great for this. Where I live there are not many street lights, walking in the dark usually means you get high beams straight to the face, even with a torch. A quick flash of a thousand or so lumens (approx 9000000 Chinese lumens) through the windscreen soon teaches them the error of their ways. 
So, you want a blinded driver headed towards you while walking? That's the stupidest thing I've heard in awhile.
I was blessed with the ability to move out of the way. Since when were rabbits using Reddit?
Right. So why blind the driver? If I'm on a dark road and I see a pedestrian ahead...that's a pretty good time to use my high beams. 
This a dipship fucktards that run fog lights ALL THE FUCKING TIME
That is what drives me nuts more than high beam idiots.  It's not foggy out, turn those damn things off!
On mine my daytime running lights are my fogs. No way to turn them off
daytime running lights as fog lights is fine, it is when it is dark and both the main lights and the fog lights are lit up that is the problem, could care less about what you run during the daytime
I don't think I have used high beams more than two times in the 30 years I been driving. 
You'd think people wouldn't openly admit they try to blind people off the road with their LED lightbars...
Also people feeling righteous about having super bright factory HIDs or low beams. If you're blinding anyone you're part of the problem.
I have remote control mirrors, I adjust them so they shine in their eyes not mine. 
Most people do this (I think) cause they have q headlight out and are a little too lazy for the 10 min trip to auto zone
In point of fact, it's illegal. Most states' road laws have a section stating that you must "not use your high beams" or "dim your headlights" whenever you're within one or two hundred yards of any other vehicle.
High beams are actually more dangerous for you in certain situations (like fog) so, yeah not always safer the douchebag behind the wheel.
I drive a car that sits low to the ground, and let me tell you.. this shit really fucking sucks.. regular headlights are bad enough, but when someone has high beams on, its worse than being in a rain storm or thick fog, i cant see shit in front of me, and then im half-blind for the next 10 mins.
Might as well pull off the road to get vision back.
Id really like to know, how do you let someone know that their highbeams are on without flashing your own?
Or the opposite.. the driver who is too lazy to turn headlights on during dusk/dawn
I think its mostly Toyota's, or Mis-aligned HIDS.
I think a lot of headlights made today are a lot brighter than they used to be like 15 years ago.  It's really distracting when it is dark out.
I find a lot of people that drive toyotas do this. I don't know why but it always seems to be someone in a Corolla, Camry, Prius or Sienna. 
That shit is just straight up illegal in the UK. If you have your brights on around any other vehicles that you were aware of you just get pulled over and fined
On occasion I like to slow down and get behind these douchewagons and give them a taste of their own medicine.
Or those newer super-bright lights which just look like they're on full-beam all the time and are constantly blinding me. 
Fuck you if you bought a car like that. 
Nice job on the Scumbag 'shop.
Isn't it illegal to use main beam into oncoming traffic or in town?
you rarely see it happen in the UK to be fair, also lots of cars now have autodim/main.
Yes!  Why the hell do people need to drive through town w/ the highbeams on whenever there are street lights everywhere?  If your night vision is that bad, maybe you shouldn't be driving at night. 
It's also pretty annoying when people don't have their lights on when they should. Some people don't realize that headlights aren't just for you to be able to see the road. They are also for other people to be able to see YOU. 
My mother does this.  I tell to stop but she tells me to mind my own business so I don't know.
My friend turns on his high beams because one of his lights is out! I keep telling him to not have his brights on but NOOO. He does it because he can't see! I told him since he drives in main roads he shouldn't need his headlights to see. The headlights are for other cars to see HIM.
Get your fucking light replaced. Twat.
/rant
This is illegal.     
What if I told you that blinding oncoming traffic doesn't make it safer for you?
Not arguing your point...more enforcing it.
This is basically what people who drive SUV's are saying about large vehicles being "safer".
I call these sort of headlights "Vampire Killers" because its like the power of a thousand suns in each one of those headlamps. 
I just go into 'Moth Mode" and drive right at 'em
If they are behind me, I'll usually try to angle my side mirrors just right to shine their brights back on them. 
I have factory HID lights in my car, I get flashed all the time by other drivers, so I flash them back with with the high beam light of a thousand suns.
That's illegal call it in.
I'm surprised that the guy who does it every time isn't constantly pulled over by police which leads me to believe that this story is bullshit.
Usually the people blinding me have their low beams on but they are pulling the Dale Earnhardt Intimidator. Tailgating outside of racing is so fucking annoying. The only good thing about dying is that there is no more tailgating. Some people don't even realize they're doing it, but it's still terrible. Don't do it. Plus if there is a puppy in the road I'm just going to have to slay it because otherwise if I slow down your ass is going to rearend me and force me to talk to the cops and go to jail for weed.  
I've been driving for 20 years and I've never seen or heard of anyone just driving around with their high beams on all the time.
The newer expensive  LUXURY cars have this and arc lights...they fucking SUCK bright
Lake County, Florida.  
Lake County, Ca. Same here.
I drive a 2015 jeep Cherokee apparently the low beams are quite bright, because i get flashed a lot, I'm just like you think that's bright prepare for the fire of a thousand suns, and flash them back. It not very satisfying as i can't see or hear their reaction.  
When I see these people I think: "Republicans!"
Sorry OP, but on my bike I'm keeping the brights on regardless. Id rather someone be annoyed but aware of my presence than the other option. 
Motorcycle? In the daytime, you keep your bright on to avoid putting hours on the low beam, since having a daytime headlight is required by law (it is also more conspicuous then the low). At the same time, you save your low beam for regular use at night, contributing to traffic safety while still being adequately visible.
I happen to have LED headlights and every so often someone mistakes them for high beams. They're bright, but they're not high beam bright. 
Good common sense night driving tip no one seems to follow. Don't look directly at the fucking oncoming headlights. 
God I do that all the fucking time. 
"Look at this asshole driving with his hi-beams on, those things are fucking blinding me"
flashes lights
"DEAR CHRIST I'M BLIND! THOSE WEREN'T HIS HI-BEAMS AT ALL!"
seriously though fuck LED headlights. Way too fucking bright.
In middle school, the cute girl sitting next to me in math asked if I wanted a kiss. I was taken aback and stuttered out a, "Uhm, yea." Then she pulled out a Hersey's kiss. I said, "Oooooh. A Kiss... Thanks."
Moral of the story: Carry kisses and offer them to people. You'll learn who wants to kiss you this way. And if they don't, you give them chocolate and look at them like they're crazy for thinking you were offering a smooch. 
I do the same thing, but with a screw...
"I've got a 10 inch sausage, do you want it inside you?"
"Get away from me you sick fuck"
"Suit yourself." pulls beef sausage out of bag
That's the wurst joke I've ever heard.
But could be grounds for some tender loving 
Someone's gonna have beef with these puns.
Penis.
Rooster.
http://imgur.com/gallery/4f0EIIl
Yeah, had a girl do this to me. While in a car with 4 other people, awkward as fuck. Pretty sure she was just teasing though, I had a huge crush on her and I'm fairly sure everyone knew. The laughing is what really hurt.
They weren't laughing at you, they were laughing with ... ahh who am I kidding.  They were laughing at you.
You went in for the smooch, didn't you? It's ok. They probably forgot about it by the next day. 
It's sugar free!
It's great for burning calories too!
Wrong, actually. Sexual intercourse just burns about 30 to 50 calories. That's less than an apple for instance.
Sounds like you're not trying hard enough. 
Touché... and probably also heavily (pun intended) depends on your partner. 
Holding a fleshlight isn't a lot of work.
or long enough
So I can fuck an apple for free?
Apples have burn more calories during sex?
Can sexual apples melt steel beams?
The truth is out there.
-cut to X Files theme
Too salty though.
When I was in high school, the "gum trick" was to offer someone a piece of gum, and when they accepted, you'd unzip your pants and pull out a bit of your wrinkly sack skin.
HA I got my teachers with that one all the time!
Something something home school
Something something two broken arms
Something something every fuck time
Mom's spaghetti
We did it, Reddit!
We caught the Boston Bomber!
Can we all go home now?
We never left
I read that AMA thread for the first time today, wasn't bad
What ama? 
Care to link for the uninitiated ?
tl;dr: guy broke both his arms, guy's mom jerked him off.
Spoiler alert, bro!
The mom wasn't that bad either apparently
I'm assuming that this is normal where you come from? I'm in Pa and have never offered someone a piece of gum and pulled out my sack.
I'm from Pa and you must have missed the memo 
also from PA and this was incredibly common like a decade ago.
I was the cats meow at my church. 
We called that getting brained.  
And when you stretch it out, its the bat wing
if you do it over a light its the bat signal
How about the wristwatch?
When you pull your undies and separate them it's called the fly's eyes
"You have to shave it or it don't count"
Id always say, "i sat in gum"
I promised her I wouldn't sit in gum again 
"Hairy gum huh huh huh"
Sat on my gum and my gum hurt. Went to the doctor, who gave my gum 8 months to live. 
We nicknamed a guy bubblegum because of that.
I like the "awe man, I sat in gum (pull on ball sack)"
I too have watched The League. 
When I was like 8,I was sitting in my underwear and thought I saw a piece of gum peaking out. It wasn't gum. I tricked myself.
Did this to my ex girlfriend while just wearing underpants. The first reaction is the best. It's surprise and uncontrollable laughter. After that an angry  "oh yeah give me that gum!"
Huh. Me too.
Would be perfect if she was a cone head.
weird as hell seeing them in commercials for state farm
I smell a sequel happening... I'd totally fucking watch it if it was true!!
Nope.. just pandering to the generation that grew up on the movie..
My thought exactly.
A great conversation starter? 
"Want some gum?"
"Sure."
"I like gum."
"Ok."
"want some gum?"
"sure"
"yeah, me too" stares into the distance
No one ever pays me in gum :(
"How about you?"
How about I what?
"Uhh never mind."
"Want to have a life long relationship?"
"I'm not looking for anything more than gum right now..."
That's when you reach into her mouth and take your gum back.
"Oops that's for later"
Yes, but was it a monster condom for your magnum dong? 
vid: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=MvTA8tlu9B8
Do you think he mixed those lines up and they just left them in. Earlier in the episode he says magnum condom and monster dong. Always wondered about it. 
I do.
"Gum would be perfection!" - Chandler Bing  
edit: for your Gifjoyment:   http://24.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_llpvc6TJYM1qh17feo1_r1_500.gif
What kind of gum do you have that feels similar to a square, particularly-shaped foil wrapper?
The "5" gum packaging looks a lot like a condom. http://imgur.com/oXGxCUR
It's exactly the same packaging as the rest of Wrigley's lineup. I don't see how you get that switched up with a foil pack. 
Yeah, I wonder how he could switch that box with this one when in hurry! http://i.imgur.com/JFdZLd5.jpg
That's a good question! Considering one is roughly an inch thick, opens from the top, and is square, and the other is less than half that thickness, opens through some ridiculous sliding motion, and is a rectangle, that's a pretty stupid switch up...
Then with condoms being square foil with a raised circle, and gum being long sticks in paper, you'd think the texture difference would have clued OP in... 
Edit: Yo! Dude should not be downvoted, we're both equally talking out of our asses here. 
He doesn't say anything about pulling out the condom in foil. It would be enough to make this, if he asked "Do you want some gum?", Girl responds yes. He starts blindly searching in his bag and grabs first small rectangular box he touches. I'm not saying it happened, but it definitely is on the more plausible side of things posted here.
My assumption is based on him using the singular "Condom," I would think that, were he to grab the box, he'd use the plural. 
There are three possibilities, as I see it:
OP has horrid tactile sense.
OP has language issues. 
OP could be used to start a small fire. 
You're right. In my case second point applies to me (I'm not a native speaker).
Really? In written format, you don't show it. I mean, the singular/plural thing is an issue for a lot of Americans, due to a lack of knowledge of how words work, and that was your only tell... 
Yeah, I'm from Slovakia and I've lived here my entire life. I've started seriously learning English when I was 10 y/o (8 years ago). After few years I was able to understand Internet content, so I started visiting 9Gag. 
Visiting sites like that caused that I could suddenly understand spoken English enough to make watching English YouTube videos enjoyable. That improved my ability to understand a ton. Three years ago I've discovered reddit, where talking to strangers improved my ability to express myself a lot. 
It sort of snowballs, because the more you understand, the more you dig into the culture. For example I've listened to Eminem last year a lot, until I basically knew every single one of his punchlines from SSLP to Relapse. 
The result is what you see. My biggest problem (except slight misunderstandings in rare cases like the one that happend in this post) are commas. They're completely different than in my language. Also spelling, since Chrome offers great spell check with automatic corrections. If you heard me talking, you would immediately recognize my luckily subtle Slavic accent. But I believe that'll disappear when I go to some English speaking country for a serious amount of time.
TL;DR: I'm from a small EE country and I've basically learned English because of Internet.
Anyway, thank you for your complement! 
He pulled out an individual condom, not a whole box.  
http://i.imgur.com/yad3Sf0.png
only if you're very attractive. if you're not you're a creep.
When you realized your mistake, you should have looked her right in the eyes and said, "you want some cum"
why would he need the condom then?
He never said the condom was unused.
Take home bag
Bang with condom, pull out, take condom off, jizz on face (not your own).
(not your own)
Speak for yourself.
http://youtu.be/f0Jx5W8JuVA
First thing I thought of after reading the meme. How is this not higher?
I hope it was a magnum, thus demonstrating you have a monster dong
I wear magnums, even wearing one right now, keep hoping I'll grow into it....
I think I read somewhere that anyone can still use a magnum safely.
only with the proper training and permits
For the right girl, so would the condom.
"oops sorry, that was my magnum condom for my monster dong"
*monster condom for my magnum dong
damn it
everyone makes mistakes.
Looks like I'm out of gum...how about a jawbreaker ;)
"Ayy girl, wanna learn
how it feels to chew 5gum?"
...stimulate... senses?
Reminds me of this commercial. https://www.youtube.com/embed/ePgrWR7KZqA?autoplay=1&FORM=VIRE1&PC=RIMBINGD
http://m.youtube.com/watch?v=Cpt5m54k2gs
horribly worded first line...
Roll with it, son. That's a good move. Show's you're responsible and opportunistic.
Worked in Coneheads.
Oh god. Imagine the chewing squeaking noise. 
Ever chewed on a rubber band? That's what I'm imagining. 
Gritting teeth now,  asshole
Bubblegum
Hey, flavour squirt. Mmm, spermicidal.
One day, that WILL work.
OP is Doublemint Dave!
Wow, I read that as 
"Go to offer girl, I'm sitting beside a piece of gum."
"Pull out condom out of bag instead."
I don't believe you 
Isnt randomly offering somebody gum the nice way of indicating that their breath smells like shit? 
Rule of thumb, if somebody asks if you want gum take it. And feel really self conscious for the rest of the day, but at least your breath doesnt smell like you just gave satan a rimjob.
Why did I have a dream last night that one of my colleagues was chewing a condom and blowing 'bubbles' rather than gum?
This reminded me :( :( :(
At least you got straight to the point.
That's alpha
"Oh, you thought I said gum."
saved
[deleted]
If she accepts is it still safe sex?
considering you're using a condom? yeah
"Did I say ""piece of gum?"" I'm sorry, I meant to say; may I offer you a bag of cum?"
Context
Skip the gum trick and try not to cum quick.
This is the first one of these that has actually made me cringe. Damn dude. 
I did this once in uni. I had just screwed up a build for my self and my 3 team mates who where all girls. Because I felt bad and went and bought them all a bar of apology chocolate. When i pulled them out of my pocked a condom came with them. It was very embarrassing
Not embarrassing. 'Oops'. moment over. If anything she's thinking ~ this guy fucks. 
http://i.imgur.com/lcfFP0t.png
Yeaaaaaaaah.
http://youtu.be/f0Jx5W8JuVA
I did this once - She thought it was a Werther's Original and ate it
"Something to chew on?"
"Gum?"
"Yes, I know"
Looks like you mixed the colors up.
You should've said, " Would you like some cum?" Then pull out the condom. 
ITT: It's Always Sunny references.
How was the sex?
The gum trick is a great way to start a conversation, the condom trick is a great way to skip a conversation.
Go on. .....
Are you implying that my breath stinks?
Oh, sorry!
You'll be chewing on that later
So you had a Freudian Slip of the hand?
"Would you like some gum?"
"No thank you."
"...ok..."
This reminds me of Always Sunny when Frank casually drops his Magnum condom on the ground. 
You should've said you meant to say cum not gum
Cum trick?
Gum would be perfection.
Thats what you get for putting your doms in your gum bag.
Read this as a "piece of cum." I found the condom to be counter productive. 
Doublemint Dave
Condoms stay in the car. Best place for them really.
Wait, not too long ago a girl asked me if I wanted a piece of gum. I declined.
Was she trying to conversation starter me?
Always accept when someone offers you gum. I can see 3 scenarios here. 
They're just being polite. 
They want to start a conversation. 
Your breath smells bad and they're helping you out, but don't want to embarrass you by coming out and saying so. 
You never know if it's number 3 so don't take the chance. If it's two, maybe you'll talk about something interesting! 
4) It's laced with LSD/rookies and they're trying to MK Ultra you
I read something like this on r/adviceamimals once. I haven't declined a piece of gum or a mint since. 
My coworkers must think I'm really insecure. Or they're thankful.
Who offers random strangers gum for no reason?
somebody who'd rather not smell the funk nasty?
that sounds like the worst conversation starter
Beldar? Is that you?..
http://youtu.be/f0Jx5W8JuVA
Freshen your breath after consumption of mass quantities. 
Why is the bottom half blue?
Holy shit! I just had a flashback to a memory I forgot about (or repressed). Similar thing happened to me. I was at a party summer before college and was talking to a girl for a while when she asked for a piece of gum. I pulled out a pack of gum from my pocket, but TWO condoms decided to come out with it and land right in front of her. Luckily it was laughed off. The condoms went unused though :/ ... Because I raw dog, it feels way better. 
So you just carry around... like a grocery bag(?) with your gum and prophylactics? What else? 
Admit everything. Right then. It's your only chance.
That condom you like is going to come back in style.
At least you have a reason to carry a condom on you.
I read "a piece of cum". It still kinda works...
"No I said cum"
I call bullshit... I'm calling it guys... This is fucking rapey.
OP on your life, never do this.
Seriously, where does this lead? "Holy fuck what are you doing holding a condom out at me"... " oh look a condom"...
This is no way to start a convo you damn future rapist.
Can't tell if you're a troll or just dumb.
Bit of both... Ignore my shit, morning me is off his head.
Meta as fuck
Puts it on
Taste this, it's strawberry flavor. ( ͡° ͜ʖ ͡°)
http://i.imgur.com/TDnRQUl.gif
http://41.media.tumblr.com/tumblr_mebg9rVMho1rlo1q2o1_1280.jpg
You... got drunk, threw up, and stayed at her house because you couldn't drive home!
Hot!
[deleted]
read the title, friend.
I'm gonna be needing some 6x8 glossy photos of the two of you.... For uh science
Go sit over there on that bench marked "group W"
Now, kid!
Kill! Kill! KILL!
Go on...
Look for your clothes on gonewild. 
I hope you don't end up pregnant
You probably got fucked up, she took you home, threw you a sweatshirt to use as pajamas, and threw you on a couch to sleep it off. 
I woke up on my kitchen floor using a bunch of bananas as a pillow once. We all do weird shit when we're drunk. 
ask your sister in law. 
fucking hot
Now we know what Rhllor spends his time watching in those flames of his.
So the camera doesn't really add pounds? Just disgruntled employees. 
I'd hope that somewhere out there right now is another disgruntled employee stretching out his manager's chin.
As long as there is a chin to be stretched there will be a employee to be disgruntled. It's has always been so and so it shall be until the end of time. 
Cue the music
I worked at a factory where you needed a photo card to enter the building for security reasons. I'm fairly certain that the person in charge of cropping the photos was simply drawing a rectangle freehand, then stretching the result to fit, so your weight could vary by a hundred pounds in either direction.
/r/pettyrevenge would love this 
I like how you say "friend" instead of "cop" here.
Shhh
Hey I read that thread this morning!
I read it yesterday
I'll read it on the front page tomorrow.
It will always be there
I like how this is a repost.
The police is your friend.
I did this and the fucker zoomed out and swiped anyway!
When you see them touch the screen with more than one finger, you grab that shit back, you failed step 2
Step 1: Hold your fucking phone when showing someone a picture on it
Step 2: Kill motherfuckers who attempt to deviate from step 1. 
Well the only logical thing to do then is kill them. 
Install ninjasnap
Or have a little fun with this Android app
I got this app and was like this will freak my friends out......a week later I deleted it because I realized it'll never be used. Forever alone
My phone (LG G3) has this kind of thing built in. It has a 'guest mode' where you can restrict the apps that can be opened (like only allow opening web browser) and it has the ability to lock videos/pictures so an additional pin is needed to view them. 
That is not the only thing the app does
Or, don't have nudes of your gf on your phone (in the same album as everything else).
There's a photo lock option on some Android phones. Only way to do it nowadays.
I got a app named "Vault" where you need a password to get in, and its encrypted. Its my porn stash.
"Encrypted"
This guy know the best method 
Or create a separate folder for your nudes, add a blank file named ".nomedia" to thst folder and then when you feel like looking at them use the file explorer to view them.
I do this but just for the pic I want to show them they swipe and there's only one picture in the folder and they go "oh neat" and hand me my phone back.
That's why I put dick pics in it to ward of snoopers and to punish those who steal my phone/3ds.
I personally hope they swipe. They will never get those images of my hairy ass out of their head.
Make sure every other picture is a picture of your ass. 
hole
yeah the hole thing.
Don't let them hold the phone.
If they swipe to an edge and then swipe again it will still go to the next photo.
I just realized I've been doing this almost subconsciously for a long time
Your friends hate you. 
Also set you phone to airplane mode so you don't embarrassing texts don't show up as alerts while they're viewing the pic
Yes. This will sometimes trip you up more than the photos. There are a lot of perverted/horny people in this world. 😉
Hey sexy 😏
No, no, no. See here's the real trick to it, from my hero BF Skinner. 
Now, psychologists will tell you this is unethical, but it can't be. It's called positive punishment, see it has positive right in the name. 
Now, in Skinner's lingo positive referred to adding, specifically a stimulus that isn't particularly liked by the person. POSITIVE=GIVE that's the key to help you remember here. 
Punishment, usually has a nasty stigma to it. But in Skinner's lingo, it just means something that will reduce behavior, that's not inherently bad now, is it?
So, what you do, when your friend goes to do something like look through your pics, you punch that fucker in the face. That's positive punishment. Which we've established is good. You must do this every time they fuck up, eventually they will stop. 
I'm having a hard time getting over you calling him "BF Skinner." Like he's a character in a pokemon game. You should either call him "Skinner" or "my boyfriend"
https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/B._F._Skinner
...they aren't talking about their boyfriend... they're talking about B.F.Skinner, renowned psychologist.
renowned psychologist
You mean crazy pigeon man? He's crazy pigeon man. It's right in the 300 level text books. Page 69, Chapter 2 The Life and Times of Crazy Pigeon Man. 
Crazy Pigeon Man had no friends because he had a big head. So he had to train pigeons to like him. Eventually CPM learned the dark wizardry now known as behavioral modification. He started using his wizardry on people and we found it worked. CPM made friends and became an idle of dark magic. Happy ever after.
HAHAHA!
For those with Android phones
https://play.google.com/store/apps/details?id=dev.cosmos.ninjasnap
Ninja Snap is a great app if you wanna show people photos, use that and the Pin function and your golden
Select the picture and share it in the mail app. Then delete the draft when they hand the phone back. 
If any of my friends do this, they instantly lose phone privileges. Sometimes I feel like a dick when I pass my phone around and not show that one person in the room, but I hope they learned their lesson.
You glorious son of a bitch
It's all been around a while. 
if you have someone in your life that goes through your shit like that you should punch them in the fucking face, so they know its socially unacceptable
Maybe don't keep stupid shit you don't want people to see on your phone.
But I want to see those stupid shit later on my own time 
computers are great
Never release your phone. If they lean in, say, "I asked you to look, not swipe."
And then they will immediately swipe again...
Just tested if this works on the iPhone. It doesn't.
GENIUS.
Google "guided access" if you are using an iPhone. It had been my favorite feature for years.
I always put in a text
If there's danger of them seeing something I don't want them to I will just warn them not to swipe. Anything they see is on their ass not mine. 
I like to just place cock pics through out my album. If they didn't want to see it they shouldn't look for it.
Or you could always just tell them not to look at other pics..?
I can finally show my mom pictures on my phone again! She's such a snoop and always starts swiping all over the place
I just always put it in edit mode. It zooms out a bit and no swiping is allowed.
My old boss used to do that exact thing to me all the time so knowing that he was from the Deep South and pretty racist and homophobic I actually put two pictures of the biggest black dicks I could find  the in front of and behind any picture that I would show him just to punish him
why are they swiping in the first place...
I just let everyone know if they scroll too far they'll find my balls
Am I the only one that doesn't have photos on my phone that I wouldn't mind people seeing?
Don't give your phone to assholes who'd swipe. 
Or just don't keep images you would be embarrassed if others saw them in your phone.  WTF people?
Or just don't let them take your phone from your hand.
Or you can just say "swiper no swiping" 3 times and they'll go away
Altenatively, don't be friends with dickheads who swipe while you're showing them something on your phone. If they're not dickheads, explain to them, it's a dick move. 
Jesus, it's the little things. I swear, like not getting up and removing yourself from the table when you have a call. Or reading texts nonstop in the company of others. Stuff like this is just basic etiquette. 
Don't get me wrong, there's a time and place for everything (when I'm chilling out having a few beers at mine and a mate is bored and comes over, IDGAF what he does on his phone or for how long. But if we're out having a bite, or doing something (movie, etc), don't be rude.
/rant
edit: I also blatantly tell people I have dickpics to warn them from swiping (I don't), but if they find a picture they didn't want to see, then tough shit.
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:
Post Title: Photo Sharing Safety 
Top: WHEN SHOWING PICTURES ON YOUR PHONE TO A FRIEND 
Bottom: ZOOM THE PICTURE A LITTLE, THEN WHEN THEY SWIPE IT JUST MOVES IT OVER A BIT. 
Original Link1 | Meme Template2
Please repost to LPT!
For real though, you the real mvp
Jesus this meme has really gone down hill. Every piece of "advice" is now, it seems, just a way to get out of confronting a problem like an adult. If you don't want someone swiping through your pictures, just tell them for fucks sake. 
Or... Or stop taking pictures you dont want to share
That's stupid. Why should you stop doing something because someone won't respect your privacy?
"What is, Scumbag Steve?"
I generally hate new memes, but Scumbag Steve is an annoying catch all for all behavior, when in reality it's usually behavior that is personal in nature. If this applied to corporate greed, like VW emissions scandal, Wallstreet bankers, Nike and their sweatshops, etc... that would be different enough. The guy who takes my food at work or the friend who lies and steals my money is not the same as this mother fucker. Pardon my god damn french. 
I was able to read all of these words, does this mean I can read French? 
We already have a meme for this kind of content.
But this guy is a way better fit than Blake Boston
How about he honestly doesn't give a shit what any of us thinks. 
Thus why after 2 weeks, despite promising he would lower the prices of the drug it remains the same. 
How about 
ACTS LIKE A RAGING DOUCHE
LOOKS LIKE A RAGING DOUCHE
Most people in the world don't even look at memes.
How about something like 
IS CEO OF A COMPANY WORTH MILLIONS
RAISES PRICES OF A DRUG NECESSARY TO LIVE TO THE POINT THAT NOBODY CAN AFFORD IT ANYMORE
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:
Post Title: I can't think of anything clever to put on it, but I really want Massive Douchebag Martin to become a permanent meme so this asshole is constantly reminded of his doucebaginess 
Top: TOP DOUCHEY THING 
Bottom: BOTTOM DOUCHEY THING 
Original Link1 | Meme Template2
Why is this getting downvoted? It's kind of useful.
Whe can't give the bots karma you know.
Too much karma and they become sentient 
He reminds me of the big brother from the movie Step Brothers.
He has great abs?
Hasn't had a carb in 12 years. 
rich and famous....you could at least try to take one away...but whatever
Michael Jackson called and he would like his nose back. 
Don't forget the post title: OTHER DOUCHEY THING.
This one is half true. I hope.
http://imgur.com/KlwwXRc
He even has that douchey, shit eating grin
Let's do it!
I support this.
KEEP IN MIND: just because someone ignores the stupid things you say, that doesn't mean they even remotely like you. 
Aka op's advice is pointless 
As is most of the love advice mallard has to offer
"ACTUAL ADVICE MALLARD
IF SHE HAS EYES
SHE PROBABLY LIKES YOU."
If she has a vagina and talks to you, she probably likes you.
FTFY
how are eyes real if she doesn't like me
If she likes me, that would make it 'us'.
Not exactly. It doesn't cancel each other out, just points out a bad logical conclusion one can have from reading this meme. This post is more along the lines of "It's okay to be yourself. Girls like that you are yourself when they are interested in you."
I ignore a lot of people I don't like.
This depends on what kind of ignoring we're talking about here. If they exclusively ignore the dumbass mistakes you make, but pay attention to you the rest of the time and still act very friendly and make an effort to do nice things for you or invite you to do spend time with them? Yeah they probably like you. If they just ignore you in general then they might not.
Moreover, people aren't thinking about you nearly as much as you're thinking about yourself. So relax. I don't mean this in a bad way--it's simply means that insecure people worry and fret far too much about what other people think, when in reality, others aren't really noticing or caring about your awkwardness as much as you are. 
Think of how easy it is for us to ignore, forget, or forgive someone else's faux pas. So don't worry--they're doing the same to you.  
That's the thing everyone forgets- we all have our own thing going on and unless you point something out that you think everyone is noticing, mostly no one does. And if they do notice, they most likely don't care.
Anything most people can come up with I've done as bad or worse anyways. I tend to realize people aren't perfect since I'm so damn flawed myself. Even people I dislike, I don't spend much time dwelling on their faults.
Perhaps. I judge the hell out of other people. Their hygiene, their behavior, their clothes, and similar. Thinking about all of it. If people notice everything about me I notice about them - then all of my anxiety and fears are justified. I just try to not give a fuck.
I used to do that too, and it definitely contributed to my low self esteem. I was constantly judging and comparing myself to others, and that beats you down. I worked hard to become accepting and open-minded and the results were great. I became best friends with someone who I probably wouldn't have given the time of day to based on appearances. I found an unlikely soul mate when I stopped judging and started accepting. We're all bozos on the same bus. 
Everybody does. People who say otherwise are not being honest with themselves.  Pay attention to what people in your workplace are talking about, your friends when you go out, random people at restaurants or on the bus.  By and large the topic of conversation is about somebody else.  
It's true we all care about ourselves the most, and when we think about and talk about other people it's always in relation to how they affect us. That doesn't change the fact that we are focusing on other people.  If you still don't believe me, check reddit memes and self posts and see how many of them are about other people. 
The trick is realizing that people will always hold an opinion about you no matter what you do, so you gotta work on not giving a fuck. 
I always think: Do I research or observe X in other people? If the answer is no, then chances are that it's the same for them and I don't care about X anymore.
That's what I was trying to convince myself of to help with anxiety. Then I joined reddit and saw everyone talking about the dumb things they saw people do/wear and I realized people do remember. It sucks.
Nah, just bitter people on the internet. Get out there and live like no one's watching. 
Yep, it's called the Spotlight Effect.
Your post encapsulates what I tell people are are three most encouraging words, "no one cares." People don't usually get it and say that's not encouraging at all, but it really fucking is. No one really gives a shit about you except you, so do what you want.
So... No one likes me. Got it.
I like you.
Well I'm glad you like OP because I don't.
YOU DON'T KNOW MY LIFE
If someone likes you, they'll ignore the stupid things you say.
Well, that was a stupid thing to say...
You were supposed to ignore it. >.>
YOU ARE MY SPIRIT ANIMAL
I AM THE WALRUS GOO GOO G'JOOB
...for a short period of time until it drives them crazy and to not like you
usually around 3 months
usually around 3 months minutes
FTFY
It's either 3 weeks or 6 months for me. Never more. 
Are you, are you me?
Ah yes, but see, if someone doesn't like you, there's almost nothing that you can say or do that can't be interpreted poorly. Insecure people don't walk around thinking that everyone likes them.
High school taught me this lesson well.
I don't quite agree with this. My wife is quite fond of me but she does not ignore the many stupid things I say.
I think the post mostly refers to things like crushes. Before any relationship is official.
Of course that's the case, but insecure and awkward people are going to struggle to remember that in the moment. Belee dat.
It's not even about remembering in the moment. It's just an overwhelming worrying feeling. You can try to tell yourself the others really don't care, but it doesn't help.
But that's when the worrying kicks in. That's when the anxiety becomes insurmountable. When no one else is around, we're typically able to tell ourselves those things. Possibly even convince ourselves that it's valid. It's when we're faced with the person. It's when they're right next to us that we struggle to act upon, or even remember that fact.
That's be useful if anybody liked me in the first place.
Until they actually get into a relationship with you...
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:
Post Title: Insecure and awkward people, write this down 
Top: IF SOMEONE LIKES YOU 
Bottom: THEY'LL IGNORE THE STUPID THINGS YOU SAY, OR THINK THEY'RE CUTE 
Original Link1 | Meme Template2
Also, if somebody does not react badly to the stupid/awkward thing you said, don't verbally abuse or batter yourself in front of them immediately. Actually just don't do it at all, it just makes it look worse.
That wording though
This is 100% true. Girls that like me think I'm funny. Girls that don't like me think I'm stupid. The secret, it's a little of both.
AKA Girls that like what you do, like you. Girls that don't like what you do, don't.
Exactly.
Women seem wicked when you're unwanted
I believe this wise man said it best.
Women just seem wicked all the time.
That is so dumb and not even true. 
Yeah I usually just say I have a hearing problem 
Incredibly relevant Scrubs clip...
Fuck off with all these relationship advice mallards. They're all bullshit.
90% of them sound like advice you'd get from your buddies back when you were in high school.
Probably cause they are more often than not created by awkward high schoolers.
It would be great to know how many Reddit users are still in high-school. Starting to feel old here.
Yeah but if you say something incredibly stupid like "Unzip my Marty McFly" she may leave laughing. 
until you are married
"if"
Until they hate you; then, they'll kill you over those things.
At the first of our relationship, my wife would ignore my propensity to reference Gandhi quotations, but then...
Overriding how I feel with what I know is the hard part, got any advice for that?
If someone likes me, they think I'm cute? Holy shit, I've been doing it all wrong turning down those people who think I'm cute /s
Sometimes it makes it worse though.  When I'm angry, it doesn't help when someone says my angry tics are cute...  It's a lot like when you tell someone they're blushing.
I better write this down!
Insecure or Awkward people write this down: Chances are you are being obsessive or awkward, They want to avoid further convo.
Source: Insecure and awkward person.
Or they will start not liking you. 
My wife must hate me...
TIL my roommate is a well-liked dude.
Ouch, my wife must HATE me
So if someone doesn't ignore the stupid things you say and doesn't think they're cute, then they don't like you.
But how will we know that they are ignoring it? I don't think you understand insecurity and awkwardness. 
The dude I'm seeing atm says the derpiest things, I think it's adorable. 
I'm tempted to send this to my husband with "You're adorable."
If he's not insecure it'll just be insulting.
Unless you say something stupid, which will cause people to like you less.
That's not true at all. There are plenty of girls I like, but the stupid shit they do/say makes me remember why I do not like them that much.
What if you also extremely oblivious?
Which is like everything I say. 
If someone likes you or think they're cute wtf are you babbling about?!
And then you get married...
Until they love you. Then you'll both annoy and adore each other with all of your weird mannerisms. It's a strange life we live. 
I noticed this with one of my coworkers at my summer job. I made a joke that was pretty weak. The other guys didn't pay much attention to it but he laughed quite a bit at it.
Until they decide they want someone more confident and and secure.
It's not a reason to say stupid things or act stupid either. Always think twice (or more) before you say or act out something. You want to be likeable FIRST, then your stupidity will be tolerated, not accepted, not admired, not found cute. Tolerated. And that should be the extent of it.
Lolol really cuz if I like, your going to be put on blast to test how insecure you you really are. And you'll either love it or hate it.
And then, after a few years, the things they find cute about you will, statistically speaking, be the things they hate about you. The nervous laugh that he found so adorable will become a grating reminder of your anxiety. The way you highlight and unhighlight words while reading articles on the internet that made her laugh, will instead make her jaw clench in frustration with each click...
Statistically speaking.
You seem to have a miserable out look on life
Too bad no one fucking likes me
TIL: no one likes me
yesss
What if I give her a buttercup?
"IF".......yeah about that
I'm really insecure and my girlfriend is extremely awkward. This works out well.
I needed to hear that. Well said. 
Good to know. A girl's been ignoring everything I say so she must really like me.
Not apologizing ever other second is a trait to strive for also. 
That means all the girls on my Facebook like me.. Cuz they ignore everything I post 
This is true. I love all my bf's nerdy puns. 
IF someone likes you. Key word. The hard part is finding someone who likes you in the first place.
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." - Dr. Seuss
"Be who you are and say what you feel, because those who mind don't matter and those who matter don't mind." - Adolf Hitler.
The quote works to an extent. If someone is standing there saying "maybe you should not go with the whole genocide thing" it'd be a good idea to listen. 
Idk, man. Those who mind don't matter
And then when you start dating, they become issues.
Not that i'm insecure or awkward, I just tend to say shit that, I feel, makes me look stupid. Of course I work with the girl I like and, of course, we talk/flirt and I say things that I wish I could take back but as it happened, she found it cute. Asked her out today. Was successful.
TL;DR If someone likes you, they will like how you are.
Bonus:  Don't tell awkward people to write advice down for later reference.  They don't need your help being awkward.
no one likes me
That's a pretty big "if" right there
This is useless
This us 100% true!!
They will...for now
Or break up with you.
These fucking ducks!
According to the last couple I've read, the same person both likes me (thinks my flaws are cute) and doesn't (doesn't make time to see me). 
Not that it matters too much - I'm in a relationship already so it's a moot point, but the thought occurs...
So what you're saying is when someone points out you said something stupid they don't like you? Fuck.
So I guess everyone who upvoted my coment section likes me :3
According to that title, you're not smart. 
Maybe he's book-learnin' smart. 
Let's see... Out of shape... Couch potato... On a higher intellectual plane than most filthy plebs around him... Checks out.
m'hagrid
I was just reading "a confederacy of dunces." I can't believe how accurately it parodied my own existence. 
yeah, there are 2 types of intelligence memorizing and combining infos.
But, that assumes you're expanding the sample size beyond two.
Is it better to be smart, or wise? Wiser than he was before.
And she's not dumb. 
Got em
Sounds like he also no longer has a girl friend 
"....you're also smart, so I guess we aren't complete opposites."
wipes brow
I'd just push through it. She'd just laugh at me and say I'm obviously not that smart to make such a comment, then say that it's because I'm cocky and she's modest. 
Sounds like someone doesn't have a dysfunctional relationship! 
And then you look her straight in the eye and say, "Yup."
Then grin, just ever so slightly.
Bam, you now have GF pudding.
Edit: Or she might laugh in your face. Could go either way.
Then we'd just fuck. day over 
http://i.imgur.com/pk3sS3V.gif
OMG that's terrifying and hilarious.
... You have a neckbeard, she doesn't exist
You're real, and she's your right hand
What really happened
"I'm smart, you're a genius."
I'm smart, you're wise could have possibly worked.
Not smart enough to know what to say to any girl.    Ever...
"I still want to be in a relationship, you...."
Smarter. You could have said smarter.
Clearly not as smart as you think you are. 
Hagrid Shouldn't Have Done That, He Should Not Have Done That
I SHOULD NOT HAVE SAID THAT
I DEFINITELY  SHOULD NOT HAVE SAID THAT
Or at least that's how it would've gone down if she was real.
"i'm real, you're a figment of my neckbeard imagination..."
"I'm smart, you're pretty."
Just pause like you're thinking and then say "...actually that's where the analogy breaks down..."
If you stopped there maybe she won't figure out what you meant. Ya know... Cause she's the opposite of smart
Not that smart, apparently.
He's redditing either from his couch or his friend's couch
How did this end up, OP? 
You're lazy, fat, and insensitive to your fit, active girlfriend. You must have a lot of money otherwise she really is dumb.
/r/iamverysmart
Luckily, she didn't catch on?
RIP your sex life
Not so smart now are ya?
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=8rwPovyR9HY
issshhhh that suck man...let me know when shes single!
She's the smartest?
You're 'smart', she's infinitely wiser than you.
Save it OP: You're more analytical, she's free spirited. Boom, positive way to spin your oops.
She's REALLY smart.
Good save.
Smartass. Should have paused, grinned, and said smart....ass. 
Line: "...but you're an absolute genius! And gorgeous with good fashion sense. Now let's go to that chick flick you wanted to see..."
It will be painful but you may yet live.
... but you're a genius. 
I'm smart, your wise?
creepy dude wut...
... she's smarter!
It is okay she probably didn't get it.
"I'm smart, you're dumb. I'm big you're small." - Ms. Trenchbull
You're just lucky she didn't drop "I'll be having sex tonight, you're not"
She's just a woman with a small brain. It's science.
I like it when boys say I'm not smart. <3 
that way they never see it coming. BAM
Xpost with r/tifu? 
Gamecock here: Please donate some players as well.
Maybe we could just not put #7 on the field for like... 3 quarters. Would that work for you?
He'd still rack up a buck 50 on the ground in that one quarter 😳
In fact, LSU's players on the field would only consist of 10 blockers/linemen and Fournette. That's it. 
There are SO many words and acronyms in this comment section that I've never seen before.
I freaking love it! Finally some college football on the front page! 
Perfect opportunity to plug /r/CFB. We're a bunch of guys and gals passionate about college football. Flair up when you arrive!  :)
Seconded, it's probably the best place on internet for college football in my opinion
Easily. Every other message board and fan site I've ever visited was a dumpster fire in comparison.
Didn't even know this sub existed. Can I flair up on mobile?
You cannot. however there is a flair for almost every dI school!
r/cfb is personally my favorite sub. It has the perfect amount of people. it's not over crowded with people like r/nfl but it has enough people to where you get great discussions.
my favorite thing about the sub is all the trash talk is in good fun. it feels irl when my friends and I trash talk they are actually tying to hurt me and make me feel bad for the team im rooting for, but in r/cfb they may trash talk but give credit where credit is due. you can have some of the most civilized discussions that you'll ever see on reddit.
It actually has every DI school, as well as DII, DIII, and many from Japanese and Canadian college teams.
Awesome! I love college football and love discussing it. I'll wait til I'm at my computer to sub tho so i can have flair before joining a discussion.
you people and your obsession with flair.  jennifer aniston sends hateful stares your way
Lineman get in front of the ball holder while he runes. LSU is Louisiana State University. SC is South Carolina both American College football teams in the Southeast USA. Fournette is the leading running back (guy who runs the football down the field) for LSU. Hope this provides some clarity. 
psshhh Fournette isnt just the leading running back for LSU, he is the leading running back for the entire country
Haha. Where you from son?
Not the SEC...
Then you'll only beat us by 4 TDs ... sounds reasonable.
One Leonard Fournette please! 
4nette 4 Heisman
The eater of grits!
UNR fan here. HAHAHA players
Clemson fan here. Please don't. 
Me too. I hope Fournette runs for 300 yards and scores 4 TD's. 
Clemson student here. Go ahead. They're going to need all the help they can get. 
Tennessee Vol checking in, we wouldn't mind some new coaching staff.
LSU student who will be attending the game here. I was looking forward to yelling "Ooo eee ooo suck Cocks!" But we will refrain as a matter of respect. 
For 5 seconds I thought JSU gamecocks. Got excited. :( any who brother, play on 
We're just paying it forward. 
Here's a few pics from 2005 when we had to move our home game to ASU due to Katrina. Pic 1
Pic 2
Seriously, ASU deserves props for setting the precedent here. They gave all gate proceeds back to LSU and had cheerleaders for the Arizona Cardinals at each gate collecting donations for the Katrina Relief Fund. LSU remembers.
Absolutely. Most people saw the pictures of NOLA and assumed that the damage was all physical. They don't realize just how hard it is to see your home go through that. The damage spread from Texas to the east side of MS or even to Alabama. 
It took a lot to rebuild the buildings and infrastructure hell Katrina was the most expensive natural disaster in US history. 
People don't realize what it was like to go through that. Then when the weekend came we got to see the tigers and the saints play. We got to feel normal for three hours. 
We got to see the kindness put forth people thousands of miles away. It seems like a football game was just a silly small thing in the middle of so much disaster but sometimes the small things make just enough difference. 
I know people bring it up constantly, and it was a year after Katrina, but when the Saints finally made it back to the Superdome and Gleason blocked that punt it was probably the most therapeutic thing that could have happened. It's hard to explain how that moment felt, because to most people it's crazy that a game could mean so much, but I felt an insane rush. When the camera panned the crowd and every single fan looked like an weight was lifted off of them and they could finally feel pure joy again. The Saints really saved the city that year.
I cried like a baby then looked around the room and saw everyone had broken down, even the grizzled old bayou pop. 
Hell, I teared up just now remembering. Damn it felt good to see the Saints march back in.
Okay yeah, that's a happy cry.
The announcer does such a great job after the touchdown. He just goes silent while the cameras scan the crowd and he allows the audience just to feel like they're there with them for just a moment.
Absolutely. We remember what it is like and know we never would have made it without the kindness of 1000s of strangers. Keep paying it forward yall.
Arizona loves you for Patrick Peterson and Tyrann Mathieu BTW. 
Edit: Some Kevin Minter love as well
It's tough with Leonard Fournette around, but Tyrann is my favorite LSU player ever. 
This actually came in the mail yesterday
how's minter doing? dude was a stud when he was at lsu
Sun devil here. Was at that game with my family (wasn't in school at the time). I didn't realize how big of a deal it was back then but seeing those pictures now makes me feel really good about my school. It's amazing how something as little as as a football game (and what LSU is doing now for SC) can make all the difference in situations like Katrina and the flooding in SC. 
Ps, we want a rematch. 
It's tough being a gamecock football fan :( 
We had a good five years. Miss you, Connor. :(
No doubt there....  Hell, I'd take Blake back....
We all know you guys want Clowney. Don't deny it. 
In a heartbeat!!!  Lattimore too!!
Actually I'd rather have DJ Swearinger back. Clowney was a monster but the swagger that DJ brought to the defense was amazing. He made a defense with only a couple star players one of the best in the nation. He'd make a big play, get flagged for unsportsmanlike conduct, and then that whole defense would get fired up and wouldn't allow a score that drive. 
Please, I'm a Vols fan. 
Ha, try rooting for Illinois anything. 
Ha, try rooting for Illinois anything.
You shut your mouth. We beat Nebraska. Luntcannon for Heisman confirmed!
Also while the Bears currently blow ass, the Hawks are a dynasty, the Cubbies are back in the postseason and looked stacked for the next few years, and the Bulls have a resurgent team with Jimmy Buckets taking the lead. 
It's not all doom and gloom. 
Georgia got beat so bad last weekend and we are going to take all that frustration out on y'all this weekend. 
Gators fan checking in.  Nice game a couple Saturdays ago, wasn't it?
Man. That field goal was literally 1 foot away......But seriously how does our defense suck so badly that you guys were 5/5 on 4th down. I mean were the Vols so we have to defy logic but come on....
Another Gator fan here. You guys were more fun than Ole Miss, that's for sure. 
Ole Miss fan here. I agree game was no fun.
That was an amazing game. Gator Bait. 
They should release a new shirt that says, "same shit, different year"
:(
As a Gamecock, I will never forgive you guys for ruining our run to the SEC championship in 2013. We ended the season in 4th that year!
Pft, try being a Longhorn fan 
cries into my Vince Young jersey
Baton Rouge native and former LSU student...
I love Leonard Fournette like I love my grandmother 
Sportsmanlike conduct! Flag on the play. 
I teared up a bit. 
Great, that was the only penalty not called on us (LSU) so far this year.
If a guy wants to play without a helmet, he should be able to play without a helmet!
Honestly, the rule is ridiculous. Sometimes helmets get ripped off. That shouldn't disqualify someone from making a play. 
Learning our fight song, Alma Mater, playing sand storm after our TD's and giving all profits back to USC make it pretty easy to like LSU even if I am USC fan.
They're even going to let us score!?!? LSU is the best ever!
Learning the other team's fight song? Awesome!
Playing their Alma Mater? Very cool!
Giving all profits back to USC? Incredible!
Playing Sandstorm after a USC touchdown? Nope. Nope, nope, nope. Gotta draw the line somewhere. 
I still have flashbacks to 2010 when Kentucky with John Wall and Demarcus Cousins were undefeated and went to USC in February and lost. And they played Sandstorm over and over and over and over. I never thought a techno song would be associated with an SEC school, but I'll be damned if that damn song doesn't make the Gamecock logo flash in my mind every time I hear it. 
As a fan who has watched every snap this year, you won't be hearing much of that song
This brought a smile to my face, I think I might be a petty person.
You and me both. I miss hearing Sandstorm regularly.
After our TDs?  I hope that's the case. 
I hate that we are moving the game, but hats off to LSU for trying to be as hospitable as possible. 
To be clear. LSU is giving the gate/ticket money to USC. LSU will be keep the proceeds from the concessions but that seems fair because that money also pays for the extra police (who are paided overtime by LSU) as well as the entire event staff, FESS security, and medical staff. 
I am a gator fan that went to the Gator vs. LSU game in 2012. I rolled into town, no tickets, no where to park or tailgate, had never even been to the state. A large group of LSU fans took us in, fed us, gave us alcohol, and extra tickets to the game. Seriously have never met a better fan base. I will never hate on LSU, and this just backs that up. So good. 
I'm a student there and it usually is like that. As far as school pride goes we have a lot.
While not as awesome as this, just remember, Americans, your brother's got you covered
Not to take anything away from this, because Canadians are freaking awesome, our brothers from across the pond have us covered as well. British Changing of the Guard playing The Star-Spangled Banner the day after 9/11.
Goddamn. These 2 videos in a row got me all messed up. 
This always makes me cry. It's a beautiful show of support on a very dark day.
I love it but it's a little surreal for literal redcoats to be playing a song about the US defending Fort McHenry from the Royal Navy.
Brb learning the Canadian National anthem to prepare for if I should ever find myself in the opposite situation 
Reminds me of this.  The level of patriotism here brings a tear to my eye anytime I watch it.
Guy in the background at 1:00 is going hard 
Why does this make me so emotional
You know, you Canadians get a lot of shit, but you're alright in my book. 
I've never heard anyone give Canada "shit". I know it's a weird place with a lot of maple syrup, hockey and Tim Horton's jokes, but, it's all just for fun. I do the same thing with Liquor, football, and pizza here in Chicago.
There is no reason to give Canada "shit" so we have to make stuff up but its all in good fun. Just like teasing a sibling. You do it to make them stronger. 
I wish America could understand this. The only reason every country in the world gives us so much shit is because they love us! /s
Hey I'm from Chicago! 
Now kiss
Go Cubs!
Maybe hockey fans are different, but I'm pretty sure if a mic cut out while someone was singing O Canada, the Americans wouldn't be able to back them up.
Think about it.  There are only 7 Canadian hockey teams as opposed to 23 American hockey teams.  So almost every home game a Canadian team plays an American team.  And hockey fans go to hockey games a lot, so the Canadian fans have heard The Star Spangled Banner a lot.  American teams have not heard O Canada nearly as much.
Yup, makes perfect sense.  As a season ticket holder for an American hockey team, I've definitely heard the Canadian anthem enough to know it from start to finish...and as you point out, they hear ours even more often.
Fun Fact!  The Buffalo Sabres play both the Canadian and US anthem before every game, regardless of opponent.  Given the geographic proximity of Buffalo to Canada (and the fact that a majority of NHL players are Canadian born), it makes sense.  I'm actually not sure why all NHL teams don't do this.
Oh say can you seeeee by the donzerly liiiiight.
Jose can you seeeee by the donzerly liiiiight.
I hope you don't seriously think it says donzerly.
I hope he does. 
If so, we're donzo 
Reminds me of a book I loved as a kid. The main character thought donzer was a fancy name for a lamp and that it gave "lee light".
That was Ramona the Pest.  Such a great series!
I kinda hope he does
I only know the first two words.
It wasn't a cutout mic, but Nashville Predators fans actually did sing O' Canada during the home game following this against the Maple Leafs as a thanks to Leafs fans. 
http://youtu.be/H-rk0zWnss4
The words were on the screen, I believe, but I tend to think that many season ticket holders know O Canada since it prefaces every NHL game. 
Hockey fans hear that song at every game, I assure you they could finish it.
To be fair, a lot of hockey fans would.
Plus, at many arenas, the words are displayed on the Jumbotron or scoreboard monitors (for both anthems).
They usually put the lyrics up on the screen.  You'd be surprised.
A lot of fans would be able to continue O Canada (especially if they'd played any hockey outside the states) and like others had mentioned: the words are usually on the jumbotron. 
That said, I like to just think that hockey fans are different. 
I think there'd be enough people that know the lyrics to get through the song but it wouldn't be near as impressive as this.
You know it's Canadians singing because no one told them you're supposed to start obnoxiously clapping wayyyy too early before the song ends.
I frequently visit Canada.  The kindness of Canadian culture is generally great.  Couldn't ask for better neighbors.
Can confirm. Canadian guy saw me freezing balls smoking a cigarette once, took off his parka and put it over my shoulders. 
Can confirm also.  I was at a race event near Toronto this summer and we met some great people there where all they did all weekend was give us food and drinks.  Very nice people everywhere
Holy fuck.... The first video to ever make me cry on the internet. This is beautiful. 
It goes both ways! Pittsburgh did it in honor of the Ottawa shooting https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y4FlJi84XDQ
As an Ottawan, the outpouring of support after that terrible, terrible day will never be forgotten. 
I now feel immense guilt for not knowing the lyrics to Oh Canada and will spend the next 3 hours committing it to memory.
Definitely helps change my view of them. Very classy move.
The team and university are usually always a class act.   Their fans on the other hand...they can be a bit abrasive. 
But we aren't Alabama and that's all that matters.
Amen
:( 
Maybe if you people would stop screaming "Role Tide" at the end of every sentence, you'd have more friends. 
To be honest, outside of the actual football games, I hate hearing roll tide. It's evolved into a rallying cry for idiots and I hate it. 
I thank god every day for Alabama and Little League baseball dads. I can handle being the third most abrasive fan group. 
We're different. You can show up at a tailgate and we'll feed you and get you drunk and have a good time. 
Then you'll get relentlessly yelled at and called "Tiger Bait!" at the game. 
Then afterwards we're friends again.
*Passionate
Couple bad eggs shouldn't label our fan base. If you've ever tailgated down here, just walk through the tents and I'd guarantee someone invites y'all along to party, share food, etc.
Tailgating at LSU is like no other.
I graduated from a state school an hour away from LSU, and attended the first football game of the year back in 2012 or so.  I couldn't walk past a tent without being thrown beer and awesome food.  This happened four times, until I was so drunk and full that I threw up in a porta-potty.  I was an LSU fan before that, but after being made a part of the LSU family that day I can never root for anyone else.
Nicholls? Or ULL?
A classy move indeed...but not too surprising when you consider that LSU has found themselves in similar situations themselves in the past.
If anyone can relate to moving home games, LSU certainly can.
GEAUX TIGERS
Since nobody else has said it: the band learning the rival's theme is a big deal.  The LSU marching band is fucking amazing.
As a rebel, it hurts to say, but... good going, LSU.
Geaux Tigers! Currently a student at LSU, definitely going see this game!
FLAIR UP!
Wait wrong sub.
Hug the entire team for me!  I'll be cheering from my sofa.
Does your sofa look like this?
My sofa does not look like that.  It would be AWESOME if my sofa looked like that!
Here try this one.
No, THIS is an AWESOME sofa. 
Geaux Tigers
That idea is just... the worst
Like do your feet just block the view of the people below you?
Why yes, zorg, it does
I was gonna go home this weekend but not when there's LSU football on the line. Geaux Tigers!
Geaux Tigers!
LSU fan here... we can't wait for a lot of the SC fans to get here. I've already adopted a few fans to come to our tailgate. Make it seem as much like a home game as we can...
Before we kick their asses of course ;)
WVU alum here. I have to tell you, when we played you guys in Baton Rouge it was hands-down the most fun away game I've ever been to, and I've been to a lot of away games.
...The 3 days prior in New Orleans didn't hurt my overall impression.
Was in WVU's band that year! That trip was a blast.
I was in Morgantown a couple of years ago for the WVU/LSU game. A very accommodating town full of hospitality and pepperoni rolls. Also: flaming couches. 
Awwwww, you're so sweet!
(yes, SC is going to lose)
Gamecocks don't stand a snowball's chance in Columbia. 
LSU Band member here, I'm so glad we are doing this. Especially since 10 years ago we had to go though a similar situation. Tiger Proud and Carolina Strong!
Southern hospitality.  This is the feeling you get just existing in the south.  Now that I'm back up north, I miss convenience store ladies calling me baby, or honey, or cher.
It's like having your grandmother everywhere you go. Check out at a gas station: "Das all ya want, baybeh? Not gettin' no boudin today? Mais, I can't believe! Ya need ta eat some'n, cher!" 
"I just need gas, Miss Theresa. I weigh 250 pounds."
*gives you a link anyway*
Oh, and there's the distinct way that every one of them say "baby": bayyybeh.  You can hear it in your head right now, can't you? God, I love my state.  Except for Bobby Jindal.  Screw him. 
So the bands don't travel with the teams? Or is it only sometimes that the bands travel with the teams?
They couldn't make it on such short notice was the reason I heard.
Lots of time prep and money are required to move the whole band. Away teams usually just sent their "pep" band to keep the roaming fans roaring.
LSU is doing it's best to make this their home game. Student passes here are on sale for 5 dollars and all of it's going to USC.
Too bad airlines can't do the same, but I can't possibly imagine how to even rectify THAT can of worms.
Most of the time, no. Bands travel to away games if it's a big deal or if there's a specific reason, but it's expensive and sometimes more trouble than it's worth. But bands often travel for other non-football performances as guests or features.
Source: in a large, well known college band.
In the Big Ten Conference the bands play each other's fight songs during the pre-game. At Michigan State they play it and then the student section starts a Go Green Go White chant over top of it and ends when the song is over. 
Still an awesome gesture to give the ticket proceeds though! Love when people realize that the sport is a just a game and can be supportive of one another.
Penn State Blue Band alum here.  I always enjoyed learning opposing team's fight songs, and I mean it when I say we took it seriously.  Our leadership expected as much or more work and focus for learning the music and marching drill since we were usually crunched on time.
There are always the asshats, but I'm proud to say most PSU fans will clap along with the opponent's song, and then really get into it when we rip into our's at the end.  It's just a really cool thing.  
One last note, I was fortunate enough to make it to every Big Ten school in my 4 years, and not one of them was a total pile of shit with regards to their fans.  Every team has those people, but for the most part we were warmly welcomed. 
*Edit: Rutgers wasn't in the B1G when I attended school.
Ohio State's marching band does it too, I also didn't know it was a Big Ten wide thing.  They'll typically form the opponent's logo while they play it.  It's a nice gesture, and it's kinda neat when you see the visitors' sections of the stands erupt when they recognize their fight song coming from our band.
As for the pregame tailgating, we won't win any awards for the friendliest of hosts, but for the most part people are decent.
As an Englishman I have no idea what is going on in here. 
There was a hurricane that hit the state of South Carolina.  The University of South Carolina was supposed to play LSU (Louisiana State University) this weekend in football but due to the flooding they moved it to Baton Rouge where LSU is located.  To make up for the loss of a home game where the home team makes quite a bit of money LSU is giving all the profit they make from the game and is trying to make it seem more like a home game for South Carolina in a show of good faith.
South Carolinian here, the hurricane didn't even hit us.  We had what they are now referring to as a 1000 year rain event.  It literally rained 20"+ in some parts of SC in less than 2 weeks (that's our normal ~4 month amount).  The part I'm in it rained every day for just over a week and a half, and I'm not talking a light drizzle.  If the hurricane had hit us and the wind got going, it would have been orders of magnitude worse.
Proud to be a tiger. Great show from the school. 
Gosh I love LSU. I miss being a student there.
If anybody knows about flooding... 
Your post title made me dizzy.
Good on LSU for doing that, and mad props to the Golden Band from Tigerland for going above and beyond.
On a related note, if you are in the Columbia area and have some time to help, the Red Cross needs volunteers for cleanup.
I'm so conflicted by this game!  I'm a massive LSU fan, and they're undefeated at the moment.  I live in Western NC and am so saddened by all the devastation that happened in both North and South Carolina.
Part of me will secretly be pulling for SC during the game.  Shhhh..... don't tell anyone, okay?
LSU is being classy as fuck. I go to USC, and LSU is officially my favorite team in the west. 
We were so dependent on other states during Katrina, only right to help out now.
Plus no one around here really minds, we just appreciate getting another week of tailgating and an excuse to do some day drinking.
Geaux Tigers.
This is a true SEC fan. 
Pshh, he should know that every Saturday is daydrinking! 
Although, if you live in the west, you get to start earlier. 
You say that like anyone in Louisiana needs an excuse to get day drunk on a Saturday.
We don't technically need one, but it's always good to have one.
Baton Rouge resident here. People in this town never need an excuse to drink. 
Don't forget about the massive number of students LSU took on after Katrina.
Cruise ships were brought in to house the medical, dental, etc students from New Orleans. 
Carolina alum/fan here. Appreciate the hospitality! And it's ok, you can pull for us and clap when we finally put 3 points up in the 3rd quarter...
That's part of being the SEC!  We look out for one another.
Unless it's Florida ;-)
Go Dawgs!
Go cocks!
I have a Gator shirt that says "Beat the Cocks!"
We'll need it after we get our asses kicked.
As a BR resident I was so looking forward to a break in the seasonal Saturday traffic...
Yup, looks like I'll be staying inside on Saturday. 
My Tigers about to go in dry
Fournette tears a record 11 new assholes every game he plays
Haiiilllllllllll Yeaaahhhhh baby Geaux Tigers Buga Nation
If I remember correctly, LSU did a whole lot of positive stuff after Katrina too.  
I don't know about other bands, but Michigan State's marching band learned the visitor's fight song for every game.
As an Arkansas fan, I thought it was a really nice gesture that the Tennessee band played our fight song this past weekend to welcome the Arkansas fans. I have never seen or heard of this. Pretty classy. More bands should do this. 
LSU should give them a few players this year too.  Spurrier is having an off year.
They can just not play Fournette until the last 2 minutes of the game, so they don't beat them too badly.
I just learned that LSU also refunded any tiger band members who had bought plane tickets to go home that weekend. 
I went to LSU, give me up votes
Had the balls to post this meme though didn't ya?
Op is pretty extreme.
OP just needs to follow up with an insanity wolf and they got it made.
If he plays his cards right this could be a holy trinity of memes.
Well downvotes to oblivion of posts do not get you negative karma, while comment's does.  
If people stop downvoting at 0 to -5 more people will have the guts to post.  
The issue is that even when comment is already hidden and has to be clicked in order to be seen people still downvote to -100, -200...
Post with -100 is doesn't lower your link karma, comment's negative karma influence your past positive comment karma.
he likes to live on the edge
5 minute replies on Reddit are sooo socially awesome
I deleted my comment because I'm soooo awkward!
You joke, but I think plenty of people with anxiety understand what OP is talking about.
Little victories man, little victories
Next step: Eye Contact!! WOOT WOOT!!!
[deleted]
Ahhh thing 1 thing 2 penguin yet again
How is that socially awesome? Are you an idiot?
Something something nothing is awesome enough for Reddit hurp derp.
Using this meme so wrong
Especially considering op isn't even a lurker
I usually get to the end of a paragraph, realize it's not important and hit cancel. Or I figure I'll be asked for a source or some follow up question when it's not important enough to warrant the potential extra time spent. 
Or that you'll get a 10,000 word essay response from someone that lives to argue. 
"I wish that I lived to argue."
"I can help with that...arguably..."
"+1"
BRAAAAAM
In order to live to argue...he must... argue *to live*
something something devil's advocate
I'm trying to go with the flow more and not fret about the crap that can flow from my mouth
Or it'll just get buried, like this comment.
I saw you :)
The Reddits have eyes.
O.O
Came here to say this. Have an upvote.
Oh lawdy jesus.
I'm surprised you didn't spend 5 minutes on this post and then delete it because you thought it might get downvoted
The top part should be blue. Go back to lurking. 
I do the same thing for a slightly different reason. I don't fear the downvotes. I fear forever being trapped at 1.
In my opinion it's better to be seen and hated than never seen and forgotten.
How in the hell is that top part socially awesome? The whole thing should be blue
I do this too much. I know I shouldn't care what people think but I still do.
It's probably because what you wanted to write was stupid or pointless. I do this too.
In fact I exited the thread and was about to not leave this comment, but ctrl + shift + t'd it.
I'll sit there and write this eloquent 5 paragraph reply, read over it before I post because I know I'm the kind of person that will disagree just for the sake of playing devils advocate, then just be like "meh" and delete it all. 
1100 link karma
1135 comment karma
op lies
Those are both pretty low.
nevertheless lurking may occur in another way
Sometimes I delete replies before they are posted just because I am tired of arguing with people who I consider to be much stupider than me.
Fixed
not much of a lurker if you post.
OP IS A PHONY A BIG FAT PHONY
Don't be scared, it's just the internet. 
I wish more people did that.
Wait, wouldn't making this post make you not a lurker?
Or delete it because you don't feel like explaining yourself to idiots.
Deleting something isn't social.
Yeah, probably would.
Good job, have a downvote.
I'm kind of the same way... rarely comment but when I do, it normally is a few comments on different threads then silence for months. Almost deleted this while typing.
What you have to do is get too drunk to care, spell things wrong on your phone, be mildly incoherent, then have a near panic attack when your inbox is orange and never respond in the thread again. Solid attack plan, buddy.
We've all been there, brother.  Just because you're right, doesn't make you popular.
I dont get down or upvotes. I'm just too easy to ignore and this makes me sad. 
Why the fuck do people care about internet points?
But we need the comments in the negatives!
See, this is what happens. I'm reading some thread and I'm thinking to myself Is everyone on reddit a fucking moron?
And I get to the end of the thread. And there's that one comment that's been gloriously downvoted. And I click to expand it. And the motherfucker is right on point! It's exactly what I would have said. And I nod. And I smile. And I go on with my day.
Doesn't happen in every thread, but when it does - it's fucking beautiful, man. Don't take that away.
...
...
embrace the downvotes. 
Being downvoted can be pretty random at times. Sometimes, when I expect to be upvoted, I get downvoted. Likewise, when I post something I'm sure will get downvoted to hell, it actually gets upvoted. Sometimes, there's a war going on. I'll go to bed in deep downvotes, only to wake up to being saved. Sure, there's sometimes that hivemind mentality (that we're all guilty of) where everyone just accepts the echoed sentiments, but for the most part, I have seen some diversity. If you have something to add, don't be afraid. You may get some douche who tries to argue with you using fallacies and faulty information. You may even have your own beliefs challenged with something you've never considered. Either way, you may want to reconsider before deleting. You may have something worth while. 
You miss all the shots you don't take
At the risk of taking this too seriously, sometimes it's better to voice your thoughts and let come what may.
i get halfway through writing something and say to myself "do i believe this enough to pursue arguments and counter-arguments?" if not i don't bother writing
I do this sometimes when someone is being a dick. I'll write out a response,  but realize it's going to fall on deaf ears and they'll twist what I say anyways. 
Delete - they aren't worthy of my response.
For every 500 comments at least one gets upvoted! 
Wow so writing a reply on reddit is considered socially awesome?
Even if it was the end result was awkward so this should be all blue.
DEATH to the awesome/Awkward penguin meme!
I've been a reddit lurker for over a year, probably posted 20x's, most of my comments seem to be met with negative responses. Shit reddit, I'm usually not asking for your opinion, I just want to share my story.  I have thick skin, so mostly I feel annoyed. 
Caring about fake internet points is so virginy.
this goes along with:
Don't be afraid of the down votes 
Why care at all about being downvoted? Speak your piece, goddammit!
It's better than me. I constantly spend 30 minutes writing a response and then lose it to my stupid phone browser losing my session or just closing.
Backspace. Fuck. Backspace.
I used to think that way but know I say fuck it.  Why should I care what some anonymous person thinks of me?
Delete because Reddit will probably delete it anyways, then ban you.  It'll also never get seen because algorithm.  
Now I'll get banned for pointing this out.
Twas nice knowing you all.  
Take your down votes like a man and quit being a pussy
I agree with what you say, but I don't support your right to say it.
I was gonna say this in a nicer way, but I like your way better.
Whenever I write something I know will get downvoted, I count my downvotes as upvotes.
Winning!
Look see, this guy ain't afraid of no downvotes
I upvoted the post, but came here to find a comment of the OPs to downvote.  I am disappoint.
imo this is not a better option than a weak comment. We need comments, good or bad. I remember a post about how reddit is like an iceberg. After reading the comments I understood. 
Dickbutt.
GRANT ME YOUR UPVOTES!
I mean, you did say dickbutt. And that is a reference of some sort. Here's an upvote!
Get a job, Jerry.
only 5 minutes? usually it takes me at least 15 before i decide to delete my comment.
Take 30 seconds to repost instead.
And that's how groupthink works.
[insert thoughtful comment here]
--EVERYONE HATES IT--
Some morning I open the app on my phone and see the little orange envelope and my first thought it "dafuk did I write last night?"
I should delete my comments more often, especially late at night :/
I mean, the blumkin is a huge check off. To find someone to give it in the first place is like trying to find the holy grail. So kudos to your buddy there. 
"Hey babe, I want you to suck my dick while I take a shit"
"Okay"
"eww gross I'm not into poop stuff."
Though if coke is involved it is usually, "do you have coke?".
"Is Pepsi ok?"
ಠ_ಠ
"Was the holocaust okay?"
"Well that depends on who you ask. After all, Liam Neeson got an Oscar because of it!"
It's not the weirdest thing he's asked me to do.
That is what it means? I thought it had something to do with a pumpkin
Pumpkin turns into poop
I don't get the appeal at all. Is it just about degradation/humiliation?  
For the guy? Probably prostate stimulation.
For the girl? Into scat and degradation?
Or maybe just the fact that you can now say that you've given/received a blumpkin. 
For the guy? Probably prostate stimulation.
I don't think the pooing is part of the sex act in that way.
Like I don't think the feces is stimulating the prostate.  
Can't believe this is a comment that I have written.
Why not? Buttpluggs stimulate the prostate... So why not a shit of around the same size and shape?
Because poo is one and done m8
I'm guessing you didn't read the poop dildoing thread then... I think it was on /r/tifu. Not gonna find it though, I have no idea how I would.
Edit: plus, I don't think a lot of people need continuous prostate stimulation, just right when they are cumming. I don't have any experience with this but again, a thread on reddit is my source rn and it was something about the weird sex stuff you've done and didn't realize it was weird at the time. Some girl was fucking her bf and he was reaching climax and  he yelled "GRAB THE EGG AND SHOVE IT IN MY ASS!!!" (Egg being some sort of poop chute toy) and he apparently loved it. So I'm pretty sure if you start pooping while on the verge of cumming you are performing a blumpkin how a blumpkin is supposed to be performed.
Why did somebody downvote me? Lmao. I guess that first part somehow may have sounded condescending if you really reach, but I'm just giving my insight on to why people would get blumpkins! Obviously some people have no idea, because nobody is speculating and everyone's just dismissing reasons.
Edit: didn--> did
When my I first started doing anal play with my husband he told me he used to get a hard on every time he got diarrhea.
This is a great place to stop reading the thread.
Haven't a clue.  Maybe the dual gratification is like next level or something? 
It's about extreme relaxation 
That's precisely why "try coke" had to be checked off the list, first.. I can't see that going down without something like that involved
Not to mention the resulting "coke shits"
no apparently all it takes is coke. which is unsurprising. 
My husband asked for one not that long ago and I totally would but he takes the stinkiest shits, I just wouldn't be able to do it.
Is it awkward because he didn't invite you? Cause it sounds like a great night.
No, Op was there alright...
He helped check of that list after all 
Had to look it up.
Sigh. As did I. Mistakes were made.
Y'all motherfuckers need to watch Harold & Kumar.                 
I don't recall a reference to a "blumpkin" in H&S....
http://lmgtfy.com/?q=harold+and+kumar+blumpkin&l=1
Ah, what he meant to say was Harold and Kumar 2.  
I don't watch shit.
Pun intended?
That movie is hilarious. You just suck at humor.
I really wish this wasn't in my search history.
Just say you were looking for Rose Blumkin Jewish Home
And me. Eww.
:( I didn't
Morty gets Blumpkins and travels space with Rick? Lucky 14 year old
My wisdom won today. I decided to check here in the comments for an explanation. 
Urban dictionary sure has gotten classy
Ah good ol urban dictionary... I got suspended and charged for uttering death threats in highschool for posting a specific word onto a facebook group (I even used quotation marks and provided a link to the page).
The group was bashing a local teacher that everyone hated and the sentence the word used to describe its meaning was not a very nice thing to say.
Meanie poopy heads!
People who perform Blumpkins, I judge you. Call your parents.
People who perform blumpkins, I won't judge you, call me 
People who perform bumpkins post pics
u/Burgdorf ,call me for a camera man
Well, call your mom. You really think there's a dad in the picture?
And I was just sleeping, like an idiot.
I, for one, am slightly jealous of your roomie.
I fucking love cocaine.
I fucking love blumpkins.
Paul, is that you?
Those boogers the next day though
This makes perfect sense to me because
1) I'm great at talking to girls while on coke and would probably be down for just about anything
2) I have the best shits while on coke
Cocaine and blumpkins are natural friends
Blumpkin would be a great name for a band.
They should start prescribing this as a cure for depression
Man, I spent forever like, "How pathetic is your life that trying Coca-Cola is on your bucket list? Like, go to a damn store."
Wow.
Yeah and pumpkins are available at any grocery store
Yeah, I thought that at first too.  I wondered if the person was from some foreign country that amazingly didn't have coca-cola.  Then I realized there are other types of coke...
Huge high five
Cocaine is a hell of a drug
I before E, except after C. 
It's just good science
Weird eh?
Or after C sometimes.
What does the I stand for?
Sounds like he found a keeper!!!
Living the dream. Fist bumps all around!
Tis far better to give then to receive 
Unless it's a blumpkin
Then it's just better to receive 
Good for him. 
Charlie?
Needs to try an upper decker double blumkin next.
THAT'S how you party. 
Your jealous face looks weird.
Pics or it didn't happen 
Fucking Pepsi fans
also checked off having an escort?
Actually it is only one.  It's called blumpkin bells 
well isnt that the only way to receive a blumpkin?  coke has to be involved somewhere in that mess.
Coke makes you have really nasty shits... so those two came at an unfortunate time.
Awkward seal? You should have high fived him, bro. 
Your friends bucket list is very similar to me "never do these things" list.
....do I want to ask what a blumkin is?.....
WTF is a blumpkin?  On second thought, I probably don't want to know.
EXCEPT AFTER C !!
What girl consents to that?
nobody will marry the blumkin girl.   nobody wants her to mother their children.
"Hello dean Werner.  We are interested in your prep school.  I am Jim and this is my wife Mary.   I am a vp of GE and Mary is a CPA who blows me while I lay a three coil steamer"
Wait--- blumpkin means blowjob???
Getting one mid-poop, anyway.
Nobody would ever want a blumpkin, nobody would ever give one.
Sweet summer child.
I'm glad I was already on the toilet cause i laughed hard enough to have crapped myself. Life tip: laugh at everything. Life's a joke and then you die. 
I call bullshit, everyone knows coke makes you constipated.
Depends on what it's cut with.
Ex-lax
If you are addicted or close to it then that constipation is when you don't have it and it goes away once you do it. 
I usually just call them blowjobs.
I've never gotten that many blowjobs.
o.O
better?
